France supported the proposal
Meeting of the Committee in the parliament house on Friday, the chairman of the committee under the chairmanship of Mushahid Hussain Sayed, in which don't put this proposal that relief goods, as well as representatives of all political parties a parliamentary delegation of Palestine.
Mushahid Hussain Sayed while talking to representatives of the media after the meeting, said that the committee has welcomed the proposal from France in which it has been said that Israel should cease immediately and allow relief operations for the victims of the earthquake in Gaza.
He from the Israeli side on attack as a crime against humanity, said that all countries should condemn the attacks
Targeting Mushahid Hussain has criticized the double standard of the countries of the world, said that people who are talking in the war against terrorism, but he now why silent on the attacks on Palestinians from the Israeli side.
The chairman of the Senate Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs of On grace of the leaders of frosty also criticized the targeted.
He said that the committee has expressed the prospect that the newly elected President of the United States Barak Obama will address the Muslim Ummah during the first 100 days of his government in order to end the rift between the United States and the Muslim Ummah.
Syed Mushahid Hussain said that between the West and the Muslim Ummah to fill the vacuum created not only for emergency measures be taken, but as long as Kashmir and Palestine issues should be resolved.
Minister of State for Foreign Affairs in the country Khan told the committee that they are going to Saudi Arabia to participate in the meeting of the foreign ministers of the Organization of Islamic countries.
This emergency meeting from the Israeli side was called in as a result of the attacks. He said that the is aware of, and in this regard, The government is in touch with the leaders of other countries.
Minister of State for Foreign Affairs said that the grace of Palestine should be resolved according to the resolutions of the United Nations.
Arab countries belonging to the two journalists, also attended the meeting and he has said about the present situation of Palestine in the meeting.
Meanwhile in Islamabad, The International University students staged a protest demonstration against the Israeli attacks on Palestine.
Protesters carrying banners and also TMD were slogans against Israel.
To avoid the flu refrain from
American scientists research come after the tests.
Experiences proved that the kept on the food The ability to deal with the flu virus in comparison.
Research, the old adage is better to starvation in fever that has proved wrong.
According to the scientists, fever, during the eat milks.
Michigan State University, said that The investigation The Infection IN THE ability OF the Fight was FOUND, and the possibility Of Increased while the Normal FOOD Resistance POWER Against the Flu VIRUS IN MORE.
According to Professor Elizabeth Gardner to people not only from flu very soon will be affected, but they will take more time to recover.
says that the people who have taken the flu vaccine to the winter weather during the few months should refrain from.
'first nuclear test was in 1990.
Thomas red from the United States, The National Laboratory in designer, has worked on the book of Los Alamos National Laboratory of technical, former director of Diana steelman with the cooperation of wrote.
This book under the title of the spread of nuclear expressway: the political history of the bomb and this has been written and the two writers have claimed that the country has made nuclear bomb or any other country's nuclear secrets or any of the other nuclear power cooperation.
Thomas Reid said in an interview to the news that Benazir Bhutto in 1990 in the era of China The first nuclear bomb test.
Thomas Reid said that on the basis of several reasons to believe that China has the first nuclear bomb test.
reasons in the design of the bomb and scientists OF THE China Information obtained during the Conversation.
He further said that this was the reason that in 1998, only two weeks and was able to nuclear experiment in response to India's nuclear experience within three days.
Thomas red reminded that in 61 Russia has suddenly there was a nuclear test and 17 days in response to experience in the United States, despite the fact that the United States has a long period from the bomb.
He further said that the experience of the atom bomb Pakistan in May 1998, he was very carefully and the full confidence on Pakistani scientists.
Thomas red when was this question that China has provided to Pakistan nuclear technology, He said in response to China, Pakistan and India as a common enemy.
He said that there is evidence that Dr. Abdul Qadeer Khan used the Chinese design, and later did the documents from Libya were also confirmed to them.
On a question whether the joint nuclear tests is common, He said in in the United States open in the desert of detainees for Britain's nuclear experiment.
He said that it is that Israel should also provide access to the results of this experience.
Thomas Reid and the question was China's program of nuclear proliferation.
Thomas red said that in the Iranian city of China with 491 in Spain, the raw material for nuclear installation instructions and provides.
In addition to this, China, provided the enrichment plant in.
He said that China would provide nuclear technology to North Korea, Iran, Syria, Pakistan, Egypt, Libya and Yemen.
Listening to the 2008 for the best
This show of 'hard Hindu' was put together on and gipsy or nomadic band of Ukraine and Justin was also a couple of songs.
In an old car was also kept on the stage.
2002 profit of eight of the second was the most successful show in which Wembeldon million sixty million dollars were obtained.
Canadian show '' tour of 24 countries, while only 17 countries who were in their first world tour in the last eight years.
Both singers, director of the show king, conquerors, girl '' the arrangements of the Union 'visit.
Madonna set up in 2002 to break the record.
In 2002, He 'in earned 37 million dollars.
polster bone action, the third most successful singer declared that 17 46 million dollars.
Bruce Springsteen has 16 earn 60 million dollars in the fourth and fifth position and his Police six million dollars.
According to the magazine, 2002, Many people in North America in the concert and participate in the programs and only those people participated in the high prices were ready to buy tickets.
eight percent increase in the average cost of a ticket in the United States and show of the most expensive tickets Three hundred fifty was sold.
magazine editor of Gary said that the international economic For singers in the context of the year two thousand eight proved to be a good year.
He heard two thousand to the reconstruction and for which this year issued the good year The forecast predicted.
Coalition ban on education: Taliban
President Hafiz Gul in Miran Shah and other districts of North Waziristan, The group of local Taliban in a pamphlet was distributed in which the government and threatened to educational institutions have been mixed boys and girls in education.
hindrance in the pamphlet is that if coalition until January 5, educational institutions is not closed, action will be taken against them.
hindrance in the pamphlet that government and other Educational Issues identity cards for women for the film will be a ban on women in all the districts and the offices of NADRA has refused to go on.
Identity cards of the women from the local Taliban in North Waziristan has been announced the ban on the film at a time when the support for the program, NADRA in the offices of two hundred women have identity card forms for the film.
According to local people, The pamphlet issued by the Taliban in North Waziristan was read on the loud-speaker of all mosques
However has not been mentioned in the letter that the girls will be a ban on different educational institutions or not.
According to the pamphlet, after the announcement to receive education or identity card to make any woman, school or the office, rooted in the form of the woman and the family of this will be punished.
In Bannu district police said on Sunday that the Bannu Mrannshah as a result of the explosion of a land mine on the road in a pedestrian was killed and one injured.
Injured was admitted to Civil Hospital in Bannu.
Targeted killings, More bodies found
According to the police, The Sunday morning, President of Mingora, green areas, and Sohrab Khan, The bodies of two people who are found beheaded.
Those who were killed belong to the Frontier Corps and police said.
Eyewitnesses say that a letter was found near the bodies, which were warned that any has also raised their bodies before 11 p.m. will be responsible of his death.
Local people said that until 11 dead bodies were lying in the market, However, after security officials in both the dead bodies and temporary transfer.
President Mingora, during the last few weeks in the areas around the targeted killings in the incidents of dangerous increased to a great extent
, in which civilians including women and security personnel have been killed.
According to local sources, More than 30 people have been killed in incidents of this kind.
So far, no organization has claimed responsibility for the killings.
On Saturday, spokesman of the local Taliban in Swat Muslim Khan told the BBC on Friday that the bodies of the three dead bodies of their colleagues who were in was also among the dead body of Taliban commander Rafi Ullah.
Muslim Khan said that Rafi Ullah was the last one and a half months, were in the custody of the security forces.
When he said that a local Taliban killed, first issued a notice on the other hand, these incidents in Mingora concern in ordinary citizens.
Local people said that a large number of security forces in Mingora is deployed, But in spite of this, the increasing attacks on the citizens.
Benazir Bhutto to in the singing of
Was recorded in the voice of a rape Lance a way of modern music now post on the Tube.
Five minutes of the photographs and video of Benazir Bhutto.
18 year old Edinburgh University student.
Poetry and singing from the deep love.
Is being said that he has apparently after the encouragement of his mother fond of started to sing.
Tribute to his mother, He said that 'you were intelligent and beautiful, you have done in a way.
December 27, He said that the incident was shot near the temple, in the age of flour from US, three children A leave.
The entire nation without you, and you hope for the heart of the are present.
Bakhtiar Benazir Bhutto's children in the second position after 20 years of Bilawal Bhutto.
They are the targets of an interest in music.
Is that he has his mother before the return of a journalist friend in the United States through the award music producer and rapper daddy expressed a desire to meet. but this could not be met.
Poetry of some Sindhi newspapers the translation was published for the first time But his voice be heard through the Tube.
Benazir Bhutto and some members of the Rape of CDs of Lance started.
On the other hand, the Pakistan People's Party spokesman Farhatullah Babar has confirmed that the present on the Tube's poetry and.
He has said on the phone from Islamabad that it paid tribute to his courage and mother of a disappointed daughter is that the government of Pakistan has been issued on the TV network.
Farhatullah Babar said that of program to distribute CDs of his party has not made at present.
He said that a few months ago the book on the website of the Party of the young chairman Bhutto and Zardari's Fake accounts, which was later removed.
Ajmal Butcher Pakistani is the same: minister Of Information
federal minister for Information AND Broadcasting, RAHMAN WERE Sent To THE BBC Urdu service ONE in a message, Ajmal confirmed the Citizenship OF the Butcher, JUST SO SAID that Further Investigations ARE Underway.
Prior to this, the prime minister's advisor, Rahman country had denied the Pakistani nationality.
said that the citizens of the organization to record NADRA them Ajmal had no record of.
did not know about the latest announcement that the government of Pakistan has changed its stand on what basis while Ajmal butcher of citizenship.
However, According to the spokesman of the Foreign Ministry, Ajmal Butcher confirmed the citizenship of the interior ministry.
Prior to this, The BBC Urdu service and a few other newspapers and TV channels Ajmal butcher of Okara of Punjab province Farid Kot town of the district said.
However, the government denied this was used.
It is still not clear that the Ajmal Farid Kot is concerned, or any other area.
Rocket fire from Lebanon, counter bombing
Israeli army and police officials told representatives of the media is that the Lebanese fired four rockets on Israeli soil from the region, in which one of the northern Israel town of Nigeria in which two people were injured.
Lebanon in response to rockets from the area of the Israeli tanks bombardment on Lebanon.
It is not clear that this attack, Hezbollah is behind it, or active Palestinian groups in Lebanon.
The Lebanese government has said that it is trying to find out who is behind the rocket attacks.
BBC correspondent has termed it as a very dangerous turn for the current crisis in the region.
BBC editor for the Middle East, according to the army Bain increased risk of the spread of the war from rocket attacks.
Last few days It was being feared that the operation in Gaza in the north of Israel's border with Lebanon should not be spread.
On the other hand, the night between Wednesday and Thursday Israel's air 60 air attack on the Gaza Strip.
According to the Israeli army, police offices, tunnels and weapons of Hamas in these attacks effects, the places to fire rockets and weapons of Hamas activists were targeted.
Air attacks, as well as the Israeli army and navy cannon office continued throughout the night on Gaza bombing.
Palestinian sources said that the air attacks in a mosque in Gaza City.
According to unconfirmed reports of the Israeli army tanks, helicopters had air support toward the area of Khan Yunis.
Last 12 days to continue this fight in seven hundred Palestinian which include a large number of women and children were killed.
While on the other hand, The Israeli army 11 soldiers were also killed.
Israel's security forces have confirmed that a top defense official to decide the terms of the ceasefire is going to Cairo.
A delegation of Hamas parallel with the ambassadors of Egypt, to Cairo for talks.
In addition to this, The leader of the Palestinian Authority, Mahmoud Abbas, also arrived in Cairo on Friday.
My heart is broken, my round return
Dr. Richard Batista said that he had eight years ago, his wife Donal to save the lives of his round as a donation.
According to the AFP news agency, said that his wife of Dr. Batista Kidney donation change this recognition that he was a fraud, and any and establishing relations with the divorce and approach.
Dr. Batista said in an interview with a local newspaper Daily News that the hole in my heart, which so far.
According to Dr. Richard Batista's lawyer, Dr. are demanding the return of his round, but in reality they want equal subsidies worth of newcomers.
According to his wife, he will present their stand in front of a judge in the next few days.
140 years, nine kilograms of free
George, the joint lobster 'was caught with a sea two weeks ago.
The city's food company had purchased a hundred dollars in the
And immediately had begun to use for its publication of the photographs.
However, a group working for the Protection of Animals, beaten, The alabaster demanded to leave as a result of which now will be left in return to the sea.
George had been arrested in Canada after which the city crepe and seafood company spent 10 days in the tank.
alabaster from the weight of the age of.
Restaurant manager Keith says that his intention was not to any harm to the tank and the aim was to provide material for the interest of the consumers.
The Protection of Animals, beaten belonging to the has said that the decision of restaurants and is an example for those who want to keep the tank to such rare animals alive or decline the food.
With the help of mobile search of child
Officials when he learned about the Intel Malaysia of city police officer and extinguish the forces movement.
Officials to know the exact place of the girl with the help of the GP in the mobile.
However, goal street interviews with the help of came to know that the baby is in a hotel.
A week ago grand on from the parents of their legal supervision.
, The police chief of Committee Anderson told the BBC, He said that he now will never back and then he left.
Police had established contact with Mrs. maltais, But according to the promise he did not return to the police decided to search through the mobile phone.
Two thousand five or in the United States is the law that the companies to provide mobile service The distance of 100 meters, 67 percent and the distance of 300 meters, 95 percent of the of.
Hamid Karzai, on a tour of India
Hamid Karzai five months in the second Indian tour.
hope is that during a meeting with Prime Minister Manmohan will talk about the situation after the terrorist attacks in Mumbai.
During this visit, The Mumbai attacks on Afghanistan and want to express their solidarity with the feelings of the people of Pakistan and India.
Karzai during the visit of extremism, as well as the mutual trade will be discussed.
Extremism to deal with the hope of talks on cooperation between the two countries.
President Hamid Karzai during his last visit to India said that terrorism will not be allowed to obstruct the relations between India and Afghanistan.
He said that both India and Afghanistan is facing the challenge of terrorism and mercy and assassination operations.
Both of the countries of the region and the entire airlifting is beneficial for all peace and stability.
'we think this ownership that both countries and the entire world to unite to fight the menace of terrorism.
It should be noted that in July last year for the attack on the Indian embassy in Kabul, Karzai to Pakistan's intelligence agency ISI responsible stayed.
A high in this attack, The FSB officials, including four Indian were killed.
After the attack on the embassy Karzai during his visit to India Prime Minister Manmohan Singh had said that the friendship between India and Afghanistan was attacked, we have agreed that we will not allow obstacles between the ties to terrorism.
Mumbai attack, listening for the special judge
The Mumbai police commissioner Hassan Ghafoor said that the extremists were arrested alive during the attacks on Mumbai only Ajmal Amir accused the hearing of the case filed against the butcher will be under the supervision of the Italian.
Prior to this, in this matter appointed lawyer.
Ajmal Butcher, currently in the custody of the police and it is hoped that the police before January 24 will enter the charge sheet against them.
Ajmal Butcher has no lawyer to defend himself.
In a letter written to the Pakistan Government has appealed for legal assistance.
India, Pakistan to assign The part of the Pakistani extremists in the Mumbai attacks.
Pakistan has accepted that Ajmal Butcher Pakistani citizens.
According to the police case Ajmal and his colleague, Abu Ismail, a chief of winter, additional police commissioner Ashok kamata, expert police inspector Vijay, including six policemen killed after their car ran away a who was in the way after Graham was caught by the Chopati.
Ismail Khan's death in police action had been located and the police Ajmal arrested alive.
Ajmal, The lawyer for the prosecution of the case has not been named.
Legal Aid, The lawyer of the cell was nominated to the Danish capital he had refused to take the case on moral grounds.
Two lawyers withdrew his name after demonstrations and opposition of a political party.
Constitutional amendments: 'committee will be formed.
environmental changes in Islamabad on Tuesday about a Scheuer while talking to representatives of the media after the meeting, He said that in this regard will be the formation of this committee will be called a meeting of the parliamentary party.
He said that so far the United National Movement for the end of the 17th amendment of constitution amendment bill was presented in the National Assembly, while the other political parties, in this regard, the constitutional amendment bill will be presented in the parliament.
He said that the Pakistan People's Party for the end of 17th amendment also sent a draft to all political parties and the committee will review the constitution also.
In response to a question, He said that the decision of the balance of power between the president and prime minister by the parliament.
The prime minister said that the Parliament is independent in all decision.
In response to another question, He said that the former president, General Pervez Musharraf, The army chief to leave the post of the role of political parties, as well as the chairperson of the Pakistan People's Party and former Prime Minister, Benazir Bhutto, who is also important role of the international community that former President Pervez Musharraf stressed on uniforms for stressed.
He said that elected vice president who Pakistan and the supporters of democracy and the services of answering the President of Pakistan in Pakistan's honor.
Mumbai after the incident, the Indian government to sever all relations with Pakistan in response to a question about the threat of Yousaf Raza Gilani said that Indian leaders at this time due to the pressure of the people they are such statements.
Journalists protest against the dismissal of
Journalists in Islamabad on Tuesday, Islamabad under the auspices of the U.N., in front of the Press Club, journalists and media workers have TV channels and newspapers with a large number of employees of the protested the government and media owners and chanted slogans.
Speaking to the demonstrators, journalists, The biggest organization of the Pakistan Federal Union of Journalists, senior member of the Solar said that the politician with US protest today he is sitting in a ruling of the house. but because of fear of holding a special newspaper owners are not doing anything for the rights of journalists.
, He said that human rights to the newspaper owners has kept their institutions and the persecution of the camp, where billions of rupees despite earning workers to reduce charges and dismissed his economy is being killed.
The example of this is a private TV channel, One of the five is before us. The four months salary was not a suicide and forced many workers today and months due to lack of are living a life of trouble.
He said that direct action against the TV and newspaper owners should be and the need for a permanent protest camps in front of parliament for the rights of journalists.
The solar Punjab Governor Salman operation targeting the criticism, said that the newspaper today, tomorrow, without any notice to employees, is being carried out.
While daily Jinnah, Daily News Channel Five Plus TV business, and TV today, has also dismissed dozens of employees
Mazhar Abbas, Secretary General of the IMF, said while addressing the demonstrators that press organizations all over the country, journalists and media workers are celebrating a black day against the journalist and their rights in the parliament session for the black bandage on stocks will be tied up.
Mazhar Abbas, According to the 1985 percent of newspapers and TV channels in the exploitation of workers and journalists are where they are working without any agreement.
He said that so far more than two hundred journalists and workers is being pulled from the newspapers and TV channels and feared that the owners of the current year due to the economic crisis further hundreds of workers will be dismissed.
Mazhar Abbas said journalists will continue until the movement did not resume until the employees were dismissed, newspaper the enforcement of the seventh wage board award to fix the wages of the workers and employees of the newspapers, TV channels was stopped by many months is not the payment of salaries.
Eleven member cabinet took the oath
Six of the rival Muslim Conference of Ateeq Ahmad Khan, the former prime minister in the new cabinet, Two of the Pakistan People's Party, The People's Muslim League and a minister of the United National Movement.
11 member is also a woman minister in the cabinet and he Ateeq Muslim Conference of the opposition.
Ruling Alliance, said that the cabinet will be extended next week and is expected to be included in another dozen cabinet minister Sardar Ateeq Khan in the beginning of this month to their opponents through lack of confidence in the ministry was removed from his post and was elected new Prime Minister Sardar Yaqub Khan.
departments of the ministers will be announced later.
Taking oath of office on the occasion of the workers of the People's Party shouted slogans in favor of Pakistan's former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto.
virus to 35 million consumers affected
October two thousand this virus identified for the first time in eight, up and down, and names like.
Microsoft had issued a complication for dealing with this virus, But in spite of this, about 35 million computers and have been affected.
Experts say that the number of computers could be very large.
This deal with Microsoft's' to the customers for the zero associate zero exercise 'plot to use.
Microsoft has said that hundreds of thousands of computers to the virus file, dot com, a search of yesterday, and included in the code.
After this virus of in the file of the kind.
This virus is the name of this file,
Then changed the details of the registration.
This virus alert after a problem which is' the TT Sarwar, 'come on the machine and point to change.
After it download files from the web site of the.
Microsoft has said that the virus has affected computers in different countries of the world.
These countries include China, Brazil, Russia, India, The United States and Britain.
the Indian Information '
While talking to representatives of the media after a meeting in the Interior Ministry on Saturday, He said that India from the
Will help in the investigation in this matter.
He said that Pakistan is an independent country and from any country in the investigation On the Information Received FROM INDIA
Will not accept dictation.
He Said that the Information Received FROM INDIA and other Information.
Advisor to the home of a banned organization, said that law enforcing agencies 124 members feared glitch was taken into custody Under the peace
And if some of them found no evidence against the action will be taken against the innocent people should be released.
In response to a question, He said that any person will not be handed over to India, and action will be taken According to the Pakistani laws against these people.
He said that under the law of the FIA action against these people.
In response to a question, He said that the Indian law enforcing agencies involved in Mumbai in 42 days in connection With the Information. Therefore Normal IS Optimistic that THE International Community, Including INDIA, UNDER Investigation for Some TIme.
He repeated again that the government's offer to Mumbai for the investigation of the incident team should be formed.
It should be noted that additional director general, a member in the leadership of the CIA team has been formed by the Indian side that the Mumbai attacks
Pakistan is investigating On the Information.
In India, Pakistan's high commissioner, Shahid Malik Asif Ali Zardari, met with the president made it clear that if no individual or group was found involved in the Mumbai attacks against the action will be taken according to the laws of the country and will not be handed over to India, while Indian leadership persons involved in this incident is to put pressure on Pakistan to hand over to India.
Anything is possible in the United States.
Mr. Obama on January 20, The United States will take oath as the president.
In Washington, The United States, The 16th President Abraham Lankan in the memory of standing on the stairs of the building while addressing a music concert
Mr. Obama said that the United States, The most serious of several generations face and he is confident that the United States will successfully overcome these difficulties.
Ibrahim Lankan tradition of slavery in the United States.
But with Mr. Obama said that will take time and will be difficult path to solve the problems of the country.
But in spite of this, I hope that the dream of the founders of the country will remain alive.
The wars in Iraq and Afghanistan is pouch from a severe financial crisis.
Oath taking ceremony for the extraordinary steps are being taken.
Organizers are of the opinion that will be 20 million people participated in the ceremony.
On Monday, a national holiday in the United States because the same day of the great standard of human rights and Martin Luther King was killed.
Martin Luther King were black.
Martin Luther paid tribute to the determination to work
Dr. Martin Luther King, was killed in 1968.
Barak Obama paid tribute to Dr. King, and with the Americans said that they should work together for fulfilling the promises of the nation.
On the other hand, The new president on Tuesday in Washington presided the people on the occasion of unique gathering preparations are being made.
It is expected that the president of the historic presided over to see 20 million people will be collected in Washington.
Barak Obama on Monday, the start of the day in a Medical Center in the northern Washington where he met with the American soldiers after they were in a shelter for those who lost their homes and a color on the wall.
While talking with reporters said: the present crisis, of which we are facing difficulties and many people in the dark, then we can not sit.
He said that Martin Luther King has spent in the service of the people.
said that today, when we are in respect of the memory of this day that we stay and think. This is the day that we will act.
He said that Tuesday's ceremony will be on the way in which several thousand people of Martin Luther King 'is one of my dreams, to hear the Kim were gathered in 63.
Martin Luther King said in the speech that the day will come when the people of color to distinctions will not be.
The BBC's Matthew Price says that an irony of history that Martin Luther 24 hours before the day when the first black president of American history will take the oath of office.
Southern states of the United States for many people in the under the chairmanship of Dr. Luther King will be the dream of.
Additional intervene agent.
Additional political agent to ten days ago from South Waziristan unknown masked kidnapped the episode.
Sources said that official Mullah Nazir was kidnapped by the local Taliban.
According to the local administration on Tuesday evening at four additional political agent of South Waziristan, A Tribal Jirga to Amir Latif Wana scouts camp.
But he has not said that additional political agent who was kidnapped.
However, local people said that the political agent was kidnapped by the local Taliban Mullah Nazir group.
Amir Latif was kidnapped when he was from.
11 January 2002, nine in the tribal region of South Waziristan, seven armed masked men, including the driver and the additional political agent Amir.
, According to the official, there was an armed insurgents in the first car and the additional political agent to sit in a car were taken from there.
According to the local administration additional political agent after the kidnapping of the security forces in South Waziristan tribal areas and all, check posts and had come to was being searched, and the last one week, The authorities also imposed economic sanctions on Wana.
8 December 2002 up to North Waziristan, assistant political agent Ismat Allah also was kidnapped when he was to celebrate the Eid holidays to Bannu. and after a few days in North Waziristan Tehsildar two people, including Amanullah was killed by unidentified masked men.
British won in the court of
forty year old British citizen to the Web site of the American Army has admitted that he.
Gary Asperger patients. it should be noted that Asperger madness of a similar to the work of the patient.
His lawyers say that if he were handed over to the United States, fear that they will try to commit suicide.
However, government lawyers said that concerns about the health of Gary are very limited.
Lord Justice stages and justice Simon tells the decision, said that Gary in British court that he is allowed to review the application.
Gary, the lawyers of the court in the position that Gary if he was away from home and family, he can commit suicide.
He further said that it did not consider the Home Secretary.
But government lawyers say that the home secretary used his powers.
Gary never even to the Web site of the American Army has denied.
Gary US computer system in 2001 and two was due to the American government has caused a loss of eight million dollars.
Gary American marines and news system, including 97 computer.
However, Gary has said that he has any wrong with not, but they were searching for Information ABOUT THE Heavenly Creatures who think the U.S. Government WAS kept secret.
Gary, The mother of sharp Karpinski said that he is pleased with the decision.
Gary's lawyer said, this is the right decision.
This case in 2002, and in the end, is a right decision.
Kashmir: two opposition commander killed
Jammu in the Indian army's northern command spokesman Lieutenant Colonel told the BBC: 24 Yadav rifles and Jammu and Kashmir police force has Confirmed Information ON Gandwah District OF Doda District In the Haus In the jungle has besieged the PLACE WHERE ARMED Extremists WERE Sitting.
He fired at the troops and two armed extremists were killed in the operation.
spokesman said that two militants were killed in the district since twelve years working in the district commander of Hizbul Mujahideen, Chanda, who was an expert in explosive blast.
, along with the identity of Sajjad Hassan, has been associated with extremists from last year, according to the army.
, According to the forest area in the operation is still on as, according to him, more of the possibility of the presence of extremists, The army said that the operation in the first phase of the two Kalashnikov were also recovered.
Yesterday, The police chief of the province Kuldeep Kumar Khuda The year 2000 eight and figures this year while the most peaceful year till now.
worth mentioning is that no violence in seven stages in the assembly elections in November and December.
In these elections, 13 More than 100 took part.
It should be noted that Hizbul Mujahideen is active in Jammu and Kashmir for the past 18 years.
Hezbollah for the first time in July 2000 unilaterally was announced after talks between the Indian Government and opposition commanders.
However, only the ceasefire within 15 days.
Later, many senior commanders of Hizbul Mujahideen Different was killed.
On Thursday, under the auspices of the famous newspaper, The news of Pakistan that was written about the extremist groups in Kashmir, and Hizbul Mujahideen has decided to review policy on Kashmir.
It should be noted that it was the policy of the two organizations that the Kashmir issue can be resolved through armed resistance.
Dera Bugti on gas pipeline explosion
According to police officials from the Loti gas field on Monday has been put in the pipeline explosion of Qatar 18 inches.
This pipeline is the Sui plant.
Meanwhile the banned organization, the spokesman of the Republican Army shows to the Baluch person named the telephone from the organization that claimed responsibility for the attack.
carried in the fourth round of the gas pipeline has been put up.
Dera Allah Yar on Friday 18 inches of Qatar in the repair work of the pipeline was destroyed on Sunday morning was issued.
Sui Southern Gas in Quetta, general manager of the company, has said that the supply of gas from the pipeline will be started after noon.
This pipeline is the way in Quetta.
Quetta shrine and other areas in three days is a severe shortage of gas as snowfall is continuing, and the temperature to below the freezing point, fell down and on the other hand, stoves and heaters are cool.
In this town of Dera Bugti in the property market, The explosion took place in a motorcycle, But according to the police, The explosion was not any kind of loss of lives.
Party administrator for the
Party of center, about 25 km away from Lahore in the school.
Hospitals, schools and students in the center of the hostel are also included.
Law minister in Punjab Rana, Khan said that the has been brought in for the appointment of the caretaker in the center of the process so that there the work of welfare institutions.
Party of Hafiz Saeed, Khalid Waleed According to the center, located in hospitals, schools and other welfare institutions under the supervision of a chief government official for the emperor Babar has been appointed as the administrator, according to him, the center has also increased in the police.
The UN Security Council has the ban imposed on Pakistan after the federal government from all over the country, The action against Hafiz Saeed and other leaders of the party and the government has been closed. Punjab in the center of the appointed to the federal government by the party is the continuation of the action against the audio.
Emperor Babar belonged to the dig, district Management Group.
Hafiz said that Khalid Waleed commissioner Lahore division Pervez Khan on Sunday along with the police and the civil administration Center in Taipei and in different parts of the Center. Khalid Waleed party from the government administrator in the center of the condemned the already said that due to the activities of the government Center, located in the patients in the hospital and there has been a reduction in the number of children in school.
On the other hand, The party Hafiz Saeed, According to a press release of the party and the silence of the United Nations General Secretary of trade committee for the name of Taliban wrote a letter in which they appealed to the UN Security Council to end the ban imposed on the party.
It was said in the letter that the UN Security Council on behalf of the party has unilaterally decided to ban on injustice. and has nothing to do with terrorism but it is engaged in welfare activities.
Edhi Gaza on the relief mission.
Gaza entered the need to get permission for the passing of several stages after he can be successful in Egypt from New York.
The BBC Urdu service from Cairo, He said that he still could not reach Gaza because Egypt and Israel has many obstacles.
He said, I came here eight days have been and still was not allowed to go to Gaza.
In Cairo at this time, and I hope that tomorrow will be allowed to go to Gaza.
giving more details, He said: I was only seven days of visa to go to Gaza first and then in my insistence on the Pakistani officials to help me and of one month, but on the condition that only once in Gaza will be a single arriving.
He said that his son and daughters and they want to work in Gaza.
'I have come with some money.
Egypt's Red Cross check of 1 million and 100 thousand dollars in cash. so they sent relief goods in Gaza.
Four other ministers in the cabinet, 63
Four new federal ministers in the United National Movement and Jamiat Islam scholars are members of the group.
New ministers from the president took oath Asif Ali Zardari.
Oath taking ceremony in Prime Minister Yousaf Raza Gilani, all the members of the federal cabinet
Federal Minister, minister of state with the participation in the federal cabinet of four new ministers and secretaries of the number, 63.
Two ministers of the MQM Farooq Sattar and Babar Ghauri and Jamiat Islam group in prime Swati and Maulana Ataur Rahman.
These departments of ministers has not been announced.
Farooq Sattar, The convener of the MQM, Babar Ghauri, senator and March 10 of his term is to end.
Prime Swati free as he was elected senator and a lot of the richest Senator.
Maulana Ataur Rahman, a member of the National Assembly and the younger brother of Maulana Fazlur Rehman.
Remember that important posts on four Secretaries are not members of the National Assembly.
clarified that three November 22 new ministers in the cabinet and 18 cabinet ministers were included, at this time, it was believed that the MQM members will also be included in the cabinet, However, due to the differences in the distribution of ministries, was not included.
Baluchistan, blew up the pipeline
According to the police, This is a pipeline of 18 inches Monday in different fields in the Sui gas plant, and it is unknown people blew up early in the morning.
Well number three in Sui yesterday completely destroyed by the explosion, and a gas pipeline near Dera Allah Yar was damaged in the explosion.
The responsibility of the explosion the banned organization of the Republican Army spokesman has accepted by his organization.
Started the year two thousand in Baluchistan in the incidents of violence has increased.
So far this month, dozens of gas pipe lines has been put to blasts and attacks on rail cars and people from Punjab province.
chief minister of Balochistan, Aslam has expressed concern over these incidents and the police and intelligence agencies WITH Information Exchange Issued Orders, But up to now TO prevent Incidents COULD Not be possible.
819 billion dollars of the package of economic rehabilitation
President Obama's Any member belonging to the Republican Party did not vote in favor of the plan.
Members said that the economic plan is very expensive and will not be effective.
In the House of Representatives in favor of the package while two hundred and forty opposition in a 1988 votes were cast.
economic rehabilitation of this plan is to be presented next week in the Senate, where the opposition Democrat Party, the majority.
are feared to be due to severe opposition from the Republican Party approval from the Senate will not be easy.
Barak Obama, After the approval of the plan of the economic restoration in the House of Representatives members, said that political differences should not be obstacles in the way of this important project.
President said that this project in which he expressed the hope that by next month, will be the situation of the law would be helpful in making a legislative environment in the country, in which the American Trade Promotion.
Under this plan, the men of the two hundred of 75 billion dollars in loans, roads, bridges, ten thousand and five hundred and forty billion for the school, unemployment, and New will be for the research.
Richard Lister, BBC correspondent in Washington said that Barak Obama has political differences to little while casting a new political culture in the determination of the character, but discussion on economic package has once again in a political basis.
In the House of Representatives party members of the bill proposed by the government to the government as a waste of money and said that it will not get any help in creating new job.
He stressed on the bill proposed by his party, in which has been given more attention on the disengagement.
He said the package, much less can be did more of employment in the investment.
He said that the construction project did the contents of taxes to create more job immediately go
The Israeli president, prime minister in
Rajab Tayyeb, Reagan crying, The Israeli president said in Gaza that has been shed the blood of human beings and was sorry to see him that people from the Israeli army can encourage on the justification of genocide.
Reagan said: I think that you are using the words for correcting their guilt and they also raise the voice but you have killed people and I remember their children were killed near the coast.
Shimon Perez said that the tragedy of Gaza is not Israel, Hamas has set up the dangerous dictatorship.
Dos, A BBC correspondent says that the international economic forum in the first ever was not in the scene.
However, said that he president to respect their age and are also due to yell at them, but they were saying the truth from miles away.
Turkey is one in Muslim countries, which have diplomatic relations with Israel but there is tension in the last few years.
'attack in Pakistan do not plan'
Indian channel, TV, 'while talking to Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that the Mumbai attacks The Pakistani investigation report will be issued soon.
Last November, More than 70 people were killed in the attacks in Mumbai.
India says that the attacks the responsibility of the extremist organization mujahideen.
India has also said that state elements of Pakistan were involved in the Mumbai attacks.
After the Mumbai attacks affected relations between the two countries.
High Wajid Shamsul Hasan first statement about the Pakistani investigation. this is an indication that the report of the investigation in May.
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: as far as the investigation on their result has not been reached, the use of the land of Pakistan.
This place, and Britain.
These two places in Pakistan and Britain were about who I was.
India and the international community has made enough pressure on Pakistan to take action against the trustees of the Mumbai attacks. Pakistan said that it has arrested dozens of people in action against the group allegedly involved in the Mumbai attacks.
Wajid Shamsul Hasan said: we are not try to disguise it.
We believe in action on the facts.
accepted our investigation of the world.
We will try to satisfy India with the results of the investigation.
The Pakistani investigation in the defense of the delay, said that such material to collect, understand and it takes time to check the.
High Wajid Shamsul Hasan said that India to present in 45 days.
Leader of the black elected
In the sixth round of elections in the Republican Party, Michael steal has won one of the votes in 491 votes.
To steal the rival candidate in the elections for the post of party chairman in Catania Dawson 77 votes, while former chairman Duncan In the second stage.
Reporters said that the Chairman of the Republican Party in the five candidates for Michael steal the most moderate leader accepted.
Won In his address after Michael steal said 'we are going to say that you come with us with one of his friends and opponents, but the people who want to break in will be ready to be away from us. Michael steal from my land, where he has also served as deputy governor.
Two thousand in six got fame when he was standing in the elections for a seat in the Senate.
But after losing in the Senate elections of the party a intervene, The Chairman of the Committee.
Now elected chairman of the party provided of after the party will be in the efforts of the country wide campaign.
He promised on the election that the party will give a new agenda and lobbying supporters arose from the party for the use of new technical.
In human and the presence of the Indian claim
Punch state of the present of the militants.
Government According to the network, SECRET Information on the army AND Police have surrounded the area and Started Searches.
During the clash, in which four militants, two soldiers and a police officer was killed.
network according to the last clashes continue For The Information AND WERE In the Area and Associated With the militants ARE TO compete For The Reinforcement of The army Has been sent there.
During this time, the coalition government nominated by the chief minister Omar Abdullah met with the governor and his Formally Informed about the visit By The leader of THE assembly of The national Conference party.
ally of the National Conference party congress has ALSO Informed the Governor From the Support Of OMAR Abdullah.
Omar Abdullah the oath as the chief minister of the state will be given.
Remember that recent national conference in state elections 87 members won 28 seats and become the biggest party in the parliament. it should be noted that the separation parties of the elections.
Congress, which won 17 seats, making a coalition government with the National Conference is ready.
Srinagar today on the arrival of the party Omar Abdullah of the warm welcome with astrologer.
On this occasion, Omar Abdullah said that he will play their role for the talks between the government and the separatists in India, However, the holding of the elections and the new government in power, it will not be possible.
The role of the European Union for peace in the Middle East
Government If the Middle East to stop the war in the reconciliation efforts in the decisive role of the European Union.
According to the official position spartan delegation leaves or efforts are hand in this work.
, spokesman of the European Commission, Amadeu Altafaj has said that he is commendable, through which a joint message of the European Union can help in war parties.
The extent of government statement, It is all right.
But in reality is a regrettable picture of the struggle inside the European Union.
As the president of the Union of the role of the Czech Republic already weak.
Over internal fight the helpless.
On the other hand, The French president is the practice of Sarkozy, as he is still performing duty of the chairmanship of the European Union.
Though France has his presidential term of six months.
want to play a role and he can, but this is not allowed.
The ridiculous situation facing the French foreign minister Bernard Kouchner.
They are included in the delegation led by the foreign minister of the Czech Republic Schwarzenberg.
On the various statements that the two foreign ministers about the war in the Middle East.
Schwarzenberg says that Israel has the right to defend themselves when Kouchner near not in defense of the war. On the other hand, Germany has also sent a special envoy in the Middle East. as long as the European Union based on the same position, we will not, On the diplomatic front, it can not be won
. the proof of this is the attitude of Israel, no importance to Europe's reconciliation efforts.
The opportunity to do something at this time for the European Union because the United States has failed in the Middle East due to the policies of the US President George Bush.
Financial crisis: billionaires German industrialist of genocide
In southern Germany a resident of the area of Adolf Merkel has left behind a big business group,.
But for some time before the German citizens were not know more about them.
When his industrial group to provide loans to 30 near the banks of the talks with several weeks to Silent became the subject of the headlines and Merkel also The future of the group in the dark.
Merkel group German maker of police again after the purchase of shares of the financial crisis due to the many had to bear a loss of 100 million euros.
Financial institutions, this group must needed declined to give new loans worth between 700 million and one billion euros, under pressure.
Some time ago, the same bank Merkel group were ready to provide loans on an emergency basis, but who arrived at the place for a small industrialist that his annual income of industrial group about 30 billion euros. its investors, irresponsible could not bear the exclusion from power.
Adolf Merkel after the death of his father when he came into the family business on the lines, while the progress very soon.
He has the name of the company Ratiopharm kept the Germany very successful and very large drug manufacturing company.
For some time before the drug business worth between five and six billion euro, and it still annually. the income of 8 billion euros. form after the great success of Merkel group to buy several major institutions in which construction equipment to prepare the hydel Borg cement from types of vehicles to prepare the Ka ssbohrer named company.
Merkel group near a number of employees in all over the world, and its assets in the form special importance to the pharmaceutical company.
Adolf Merkel had stated many times in his life: we pharmacy while four generations.
Now my children of this organization, and I hope that this organization is still a few hundred years of my family will continue.
After the suicide of banks, The group VEM for the approval of the interim loans worth 400 million euros, But the condition is that VEM form will have to negotiate in order to improve the financial position of the group on the basis of long term.
It after the death of group, they will not be never.
Crime rate in foreign people in Germany
Latest statistics from the 2004 between 2007 to foreigners, the ratio of the crimes.
9 percent to 21.
Up to 4 percent.
province before Interior Minister Joachim Herrmann According to this is only a formal change.
He said: it is necessary to be kept in mind that the German citizenship is increasing the number of foreigners.
So it should be reported that although the perpetration of the crime in statistics German citizen, but this is the background of foreign.
Herrmann said that his province 2010 Facts and figures about the culprits, while It will also keep in mind.
The province is also being thought on the same lines in Hamburg.
CDU belonging to the internal affairs of the Senator Christoph Ahlhaus said: in a scientific way when the research is already in its own results can not but it depends on these statistics, which come after the research.
Ahlhaus Crime Prevention, a provincial office of sampled drew attention to the report, which was prepared in 2006 and the Hamburg part of the city Bergdorf had been discovered in the crimes that foreigners in the participation of many percent.
Results found that foreigners here
Crime rate than in all of the crimes in the province.
On the contrary, when it was reviewed the rate of crime in youth during the 2006 in Berlin revealed that foreign background, the ratio of young 44.
7 percent.
, However, other political parties of Germany, for example, SPD, environment, The party of Greenberg arm of the party Linkspartei that crimes against the proposal, and figures together, while also collected THE Information THAT The German Is the background Of Foreign Citizens.
quick withdrawal of forces from Gaza:
stressed the masses, permanent and lasting ceasefire agreement is essential for the complete withdrawal of the army.
Hamas and Israel announced a ceasefire on Sunday.
The Islamic militant group Hamas has announced a ceasefire on Saturday said that within a week, The Israeli forces completely out of the Gaza Strip and the Gaza Strip should be ended.
On the other hand, leader Ismail Hannah said that Israel in the war to win by God's destiny.
He said that Israel failed to achieve their goals in the war.
Earlier on Sunday in the Egyptian city of Sharm el-Sheikh held a meeting of the leaders of European and Arab countries with Israel in which demanded immediate withdrawal of the troops.
In the meeting, it was decided that as soon as for an international conference will be held.
German Chancellor Angela Merkel also participated in the meeting.
The war that continued for three weeks between Israel and Hamas of Yangon, At least 13 Palestinians and 13 Israeli, including Ten soldiers, were killed.
On the other hand, The Palestinian President Abbas stressed on the importance of making United national government in the Palestinian areas.
Germany in the name of Al Qaeda's video message
Thirty minutes duration of one person in the video, a black turban, wearing, and onto the gun in the hand is a message to the German Government.
This man by the name of Abu Talha, introduced and is in the German language.
The video message in Arabic are also present.
screens of The on Ansar al-Islam of There, and video is registered in the history of October 2008.
In this message, The German Government said that a large number of troops in Afghanistan and the country has expressed his belief that the attack will not be, this easy, and what is it?
To telling the person who though no threat of indirect attacks on Germany.
Coalition forces in Afghanistan, The number of German soldiers in Nato are around three thousand.
German parliament in October last year to send a thousand troops to Afghanistan has also approved the law.
Germany to meet Ansar al-Islam is the first message.
scare to keep an eye on issues related to terrorism, a noted Mikhail LU DERS, with regard to this message: the suicide attack outside the German embassy in Kabul is a proof that we take it seriously.
In the last few years to Ansar al-Islam is released video messages on the internet and such messages after the attack.
On Saturday, The military organization of the responsibility of the suicide attack outside the German embassy in Kabul by the Taliban.
Most German newspapers and observers from the Ansar al-Islam message by this attack.
They are making a target of Germany.
fundamentalist Muslims, Germany's Afghan policy The negative to.
Not only in Afghanistan but also in the Middle East on the German Government biased to adopt a policy accusing.
And because they are considering its target for Germany.
Meanwhile, The German Government has said that the video of the Before coming to the German intelligence knew about it.
German Federal prevention of this video is busy in the message.
assumed the post of US Presidency.
In this context, the American people, on the one hand, The only several expectations.
While Barak Obama to become the president of the United States are received messages of congratulations from all over the front of their expectations.
In this regard, The German Chancellor Angela Merkel has expressed confidence in the new US president.
I am sure that on the basis of deep friendship and partnership between the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States we can solve the problems it faces.
Russian Prime Minister Mir, Putin said that a serious and open heart and the owner of the is a good thing.
, The former American President George W. Bush's policies in the face of criticism.
But his administration to China to play a constructive role on the international level is praised for the movement while the new China about the US president has said that they will have to work for strong military relations between the two countries.
German city bloom Chinese expert working in politics woo says:
In this context, I am confident that in the coming weeks and months and his economic team will cast the pressure and the Beijing government will be forced to adopt a resilient and the market to keep the exchange rate for the Chinese currency.
The former US administration has made further relations with India.
Where these relations can carry about American professor of sociology in New Delhi, Christopher rule says: we have already come close in a strategic partnership, but, but could not bring any change.
Pope has also In a message in the name of stressed the need to promote the atmosphere of peace and cooperation.
Provincial elections in Iraq
The year 2005 is the first important elections in the country after the war.
In provincial elections 440 seats for the 14,400 More than in.
During the elections, to maintain the peace and order situation for eight thousand police and soldiers have been stationed in Iraq.
In view of this danger, that such important day explosion or any and all the borders of Iraq not to be scare attacks A day earlier, on Friday were sealed.
In addition to this, the airport was shut down and has imposed a ban on public transport.
According to the Information, Due to The Ban on Transport CAn't see the traffic on the roads and IRAQI Children Playing Football ON THE roads are Coming.
During the recent Iraqi elections with the security situation on the one hand, it will be the year of 2011 after the withdrawal of American troops from Iraq In agencies would control the reigns of the country or not, On the other hand, political analyst As a experience and are taking, which will be assessed that the Iraqi people are ready to head for the democratic change in the country.
Provincial elections are being held in Iraq with the help of the United Nations and about eight hundred international observers are to take stock of the electoral process.
day today the whole day in Iran Hazrat Imam Hussein, The was celebrated with respect and honor of the great sacrifice
Mehr News Agency, According to the report, the Iranian capital, Tehran in all the major cities, including Hazrat Imam Hussein,, the celebrated with great respect and reverence extensively offered on this occasion Aza rallies and participate in a large number of Mir and Nabi Mukarram, to his condolence to the death of the, Today Iran son Mir Nabi Mukarram, Hazrat Imam Hussein, The In the field of Karbala in the memory of the Grand sacrifice and is behind believers, Syed Hazrat Imam Hussein,, in the field of the Karbala example of sacrifice and on a large scale odds and participate in the rallies.
Gaza Juan area the retreat of Israeli forces from Palestinian warriors of the loyalty
Mehr News Agency of Urdu service, According to the right in the Gaza population from the Israeli side, The 16th day of the Battle of bombardment continued till now in Israel's air, naval and ground attacks on Gaza, 880 persons martyred and 3700 Palestinians were injured.
Martyrs In the 275 innocent at treason are also among the Arab leaders and the international human rights organizations called on the grenade in the embrace of death lives.
Funeral of Gaza today Mujahidins, again forced to accept the Israeli forces from the area and the power of faith and martyrdom are great firmness and show of loyalty and support of the Zionist enemy rhyme on the narrow.
If not betrayal of sinister Egyptian President Hosni of Hamas, and brave Mujahid when Israel defeated four away from the Israeli siege, but with the Egyptian Muslim Palestinians under siege which is the most tragic incident of Arab history
On the other hand, the governments of Saudi Arabia and Jordan to Israel for political, economic, and everyday and Gaza are unarmed Muslims with treason and being with the Israelis.
Park IBM, The United States will adopt a new strategy with Iran
Mehr News Agency, According to the report, the elected president of the United States, Barak Obama, while talking with ABC news channel said that they will adopt new and modern strategy on the issue of Iran.
Barak Obama said that Iran will be a big challenges for the American Government.
Barak Obama said that the Iranian support of Hezbollah and the Palestinian Islamic group Hamas and Iran's nuclear concern on the program.
But they will not keep the current US President Bush's policy in Iran and will adopt a different policy in the relations with Iran.
Barak Obama said that his real aim to completely clear, mutual respect and stressed on the desire of the talks.
have said in the past that the process of talks with Iran in not impose any conditions to be.
During the interview, He expressed the hope that his administration with regard to Iran on this new strategy will follow.
Obama said about the Middle East crisis that they are formed a special team in this regard.
Will start work after the January 20 for the establishment of peace efforts in the Middle.
Bush American incompetent and Manipur, President Bush its mistakes in addressing the press last admitted.
Mehr News Agency told the Associated Press from that the US President George Bush in his last press conference of its mistakes and admitted the crimes.
While addressing a press conference in the White House, President Bush has said that the newly elected President of Obama than as a gesture of goodwill feelings are, However, for the biggest challenge will be to prevent possible attacks on the United States.
He said that the completion of the mission in Iraq and social security reforms his mistakes.
President Bush has said that he was for the sake of the security of the United States.
Israeli aggression in Gaza in response to several questions about the US President George Bush said that Israel has the right to defend themselves. according to him, the Hamas does not have the right to defend himself and Hamas should not have to Israel, The United States and the world oppressor instead of the oppressed should urge the neck
unworthy of the United States and President also said that Hamas weapons not militarily to Israel and the United States, the world's most deadly and destructive weapons to provide the Palestinians with Israel in the murder of American weapons to benefit Israel, Bush also praised the Arabs and a friend of Israel.
Bush in Abu Ghraib and Guantanamo jails in shame on some of the crimes.
According to observers, The case of Bush on war crimes should be set up and the organizations will be a very big favor at his humanity will do this work.
President Ahmadinejad The Iranian president expressed his regret on the rest of the leaders of the Arab countries.
Mehr News Agency, According to the report, said that the President of Iran, Dr. origin of Israeli aggression on Gaza and this injustice and oppression leaders of silence on Eid expressed the sorrow of the criticism.
Was Born the summits of the Arab countries and their silence on Israel's barbaric action on Gaza surprised said Palestinian people that Israel lettuce is the Palestinian children, women and civilians is a target of barbarism and Arab ironman, has not issued a statement.
President Ahmadinejad has said that all the Arab countries against Israel and unite the oppressed Muslims of Gaza to Israel's evil and leading to the injustice and oppression.
Ahmadinejad the king of Saudi Arabia to clear their position about the human genocide at the hands of Israel in Gaza
Mehr News Agency, According to the report, the ruler of Saudi Arabia, President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad said in his message that the name of Abdullah of Saudi Arabia King of silence on the human genocide and the murder of innocent children and women in Gaza in Gaza while Islam is the cause of encouraging the
President Ahmadinejad has said in the message that you their true position in Gaza and the support it so on behalf of the enemies of the Islamic Front, the differences in the efforts failed.
President Ahmadinejad has said in his message that you know that 19 days in Gaza from Israel on genocide base is innocent because the murder of innocent children houses, mosques, schools and hospitals in the barbaric bombardment on Gaza, Israeli government of unarmed Muslims in these circumstances, like you from the rest of the boosting of Israel
President Ahmadinejad, Abdullah said that And as an Islamic countries are concrete steps against Israel, you with these countries expectations of
President Ahmadinejad said that the success of the Palestinians in Gaza will prosper.
professionals and they will be the first victory on the oppressor and promised of Almighty Allah.
President George W. Bush terrorism is still a threat for the United States
Mehr news agency quoting the German news agency that the US President George Bush in his farewell speech, his successor and an address to the nation, said that although seven years earlier than the United States today is safe but still the danger of terrorism is the head of the United States.
Bush said that the attack on the United States to secure gaze from the terrorist enemy and they are determined to attack on the United States and the United States should not be oblivious to its security plans.
President Bush to reduce the grief of millions of Palestinians in Gaza and its aggressive and the defense of the wrong policies of the United States, The president said that the United States is still the biggest supporter of freedom, However, observers of the American these statements do not accept the truth of the president because the United States is the pioneer of freedom and human rights, is a supporter of the United States in the world is the most evil country like Israel savage not only of the government but it is directly involved in crime.
Israeli killings of children, women and civilians, and the president of the United States, saying it is the US and the world Freedom House and in other places of the world.
Osama Hamdan will continue to teach in Palestine
Mehr News Agency, According to the report, Hamas representative in Lebanon Osama Hamdan, speaking with the French news agency, said that Israel has sided with the war international Comprehensive cease fire against the efforts of when he said To will remain in Gaza at this time to one side of the ceasefire will be meaningless.
He has said that one of the war to avoid defeat for Israel's failed attempt to said that if Israel wants continual peace that to end will have to accept the conditions of Hamas
Hamas leader in Lebanon, made it clear that the rest of the Israeli army in the Gaza Strip if Israel had unilaterally cease fire against the resistance will continue.
Beirut in solidarity with the people of Gaza while addressing the conference, Osama Hamdan, the European countries demanded the reassignment severing relations with Israel.
Hamas leader said that the increasing number of martyrs and injured our determination and courage and will be high.
On the Palestinian people, He said, a rock in the war against the enemy.
Taliban in Pakistan's tribal region of North Waziristan, Pakistan has killed six people.
Mehr news agency quoting the Reuters in North Waziristan, the tribal area of Pakistan that killed two Afghan civilians and four Pakistanis in the Taliban accused of spying.
According to the local people on Tuesday morning, the district moral area of the four dead bodies were found, which have been shot and killed.
Two dead bodies from the Mrannshah president who was thrown in a market of the market.
Dead bodies have also found the letters written in Urdu, in which has been claimed that injures espionage.
Two weeks ago, The President of North Waziristan, Mrannshah was murdered in two Afghan citizens accused of spying.
Killed 15 persons accused of spying for the United States in the last 12 days.
It should be noted that in North and South Waziristan casting during six years of more than one hundred people accused of spying was killed in the Taliban is that they are involved in this type of murder cases.
The notorious jail signed orders to stop the expected
Mehr news agency quoting the sources that the US president Today Moby the notorious jail will signed orders to stop
New American President Barak Hussein Obama has started to follow the level on promises of his election campaign.
In this regard President Obama has ordered the plan for the withdrawal of US forces from Iraq, while the US president Today Moby the notorious jail will signed orders to stop.
Order is being expected that President Barak Obama, who signed today, under which Prison, will be closed within a year.
Besides this, the White House on the ways of investigation of suspected terrorists from Nazaire review and also ordered a ban on bad words from prisoners expected to be released.
President Barak Obama has started work on the first day of his presidency to fulfill the promises of the elections and first of all the action of the government and steps of transparency.
, observers say that the American president has started efforts to save the reputation of the United States on the international level, but they get success in this very difficult, because as long as the United States on the support of Israel's savage government back pack until it can do not expect any good work if the United States wants to save its reputation in the world, to Israel to abandon should and should not be involved in the crime.
Tony Blair Islamic organisation Hamas stressed on the need to include talks on
Mehr news agency quoting the British newspaper The times that of the British Prime Minister Tony Blair has stressed on the need to include Hamas in the peace process in the Middle East.
According to the newspaper, Tony Blair said that it is important that a way should be found through which Hamas to be brought in the peace process in the Middle East The Bush only to talk with Mahmoud Abbas and Hamas to ignore also severely criticized it should be noted that the western countries have Hamas and Nizami steam to power and now it is said to be included in the talks before the Hamas as a terrorist organization, to be a terrorist organization which was home to the defence of their country free from the others to the struggle of the house and the country like Israel occupied the government has kept forcefully over 60 years.
Complete Strike in murder of businessmen in Karachi, Quetta
In Karachi on Thursday against the death of four businessmen a complete strike in Quetta and other areas.
During this all business centers were closed when traffic was also less than usual.
strike to protest the appeal of Baluchistan merchants, Milli Awami Party and Jamiat Islam had, alleged that these traders to Karachi police was killed when he was in his car at the time of the alleged shooting, Tariq reached showroom of their vehicles on the road.
Merchants President Abdul Kakar Rahman demanded that the arrested Police personnel involved in the incident and action will be taken against them.
But not immediately about the incident in front of the police.
killed the four businessmen belong to the border city of Chaman.
strike by the government on the occasion of the security measures were taken on a large scale and was appointed by the police at important places all over the city.
Israeli U.NN commander of Hamas was killed in the attack.
Israel a U.NN commander of Hamas was killed in an air attack.
This in the Gaza Strip and Israel in a week of attacks Hamas, The death of other important personality.
Hamas officials said that Abu Zakaria located in the east of Gaza City on Saturday in al-shujaiya locality were killed.
Israel on Thursday in another air attack The Hamas dull Ryan were killed.
Living in Syria, Hamas leader Khalid, the exile of expressed the determination to take revenge and warned Israel against the ground attack on Gaza.
Gaza Thousands of soldiers and tanks are deployed on the border of Israel and they are waiting for the military orders.
The United States has appealed to the fire. but said that the decision of the invasion of Gaza or not depends on Israel.
US President George W. Bush in his weekly speech on the radio on Hamas violence incentive for stupendously accused of terrorism to the rocket attacks on Israel.
He said that the United States is working for the cease fire, but no one bilateral agreement will not be acceptable.
Three bodies found in North Waziristan
Pakistani security officials said that the bodies of the three men in the tribal area of North Waziristan.
suspect that the Taliban killed the death penalty.
The bodies was found near Miran Shah, the main town of North Waziristan, and they are such found in which the men were accused of spying for the United States.
Officials said that a dead body is probably at the local man, which last week was.
He said that range from bullets Two dead bodies of the Afghan citizens.
Continued on the 10th day of the Israeli attack in Gaza
A Palestinian child injured in Israeli missile attack on Israel's land forces in the entire area of the Gaza Strip, Hamas, against While the Israeli air force 10th suspected hideouts of militants in the attacks continue.
Israeli Defense Minister bar, said on Monday that the military operation will continue until the time when the people of South Israel Hamas rocket attacks should not be safe.
However Israel is continuing despite the attacks of the firing of rockets by Hamas, which killed four people, including three civilians in Israel.
Hamas leader Mahmoud Zuhayr has urged his colleagues on Monday that he and the replacement of the Israeli forces to target Israeli civilians.
But a Hamas official has said that the Organization on the latest situation of the violence on Monday to consider a plan to send delegation to Egypt.
In Gaza, a Palestinian woman injured in Gaza, medical sources said that in the last 10 days, about 530 people have been killed, and also included 11 civilians, who died on Monday in which at least five.
Israel has reported the death of a military and 30 more injured in the attack on the ground.
Military action by Israel to the news of the the purpose of foreign journalists in Gaza to stop.
elected vice president Joseph arrived in Pakistan
Minister of external affairs, The American vice president welcomed
The United States elected vice president Joseph along with his delegation on a visit to Pakistan on Friday arrived in Islamabad.
External Affairs Minister Shah Mahmood Qureshi and the senior officials of the American embassy.
US Senator Lindsy Graham in this visit with.
US embassy press officer of the La told the Voice of America that the newly elected president will hold talks on various regional affairs with the Pakistani leadership during his visit but he avoided to disclose more details.
Of the Foreign Office, according to the sources, Joseph senior government officials, as well as the head of the army General Ashfaq Kiyani, will also meet.
It is expected that these meetings in important bilateral and international issues will be exchanged views on issues related to the war against terrorism.
Joseph vowed to Pakistan was
On his arrival in Islamabad after Joseph met with President Asif Ali Zardari.
During the meeting the president on his role in establishing close relations between Pakistan and the United States vowed the honor of Pakistan.
It should be noted that Joseph last year as the chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, senator with a bill was introduced in the country in which the United States during the next five years for Pakistan has been recommended to seven by three times. 5 billion dollars in military aid.
Former President Pervez Musharraf's' uniform 'in has played an important role, with Prime Minister
Yousaf Raza Gilani and file photo
Prime Minister Yousaf Raza Gilani said that elected vice president of the United States, which former President Pervez Musharraf's uniform has played an important role in the position of the head of the army and the cricketing for democracy in The of assistance
. Yousaf Raza Gilani, made the statement while talking to journalists at the Karachi Ship Yard.
Brought said that the Pro Pakistan or the supporters of the leader and the Pakistan as the US Senate Foreign presented a bill to 15 billion dollars for the Chairman of the Committee of Pakistan.
US spy planes in Pakistani territory from the missile attacks once again condemned the prime minister, while Pakistan said there is not any kind of agreement with a US Government about the attacks and their taken skins For this is a matter of sovereignty of Pakistan he could not give any permission of such attacks in the country
Brought also expressed the prospect that will change in the policy of the United States after forming the new government in the United States.
file photo
Yousaf Raza Gilani said that the government has a large victory to terrorists from the tribal, but S planes from the missile attacks are harmful to the efforts of the government and terrorist with the help of the tribes.
Brought said that agree with the stand of the international community.
The Prime Minister further said that if no reliable evidence should be given Pakistan forces will take action in their areas.
Mumbai attacks on Prime Minister Yousaf Raza Gilani, stand In said that if India to provide evidence, on the basis of the investigation will be involvement of the evidence against her will be taken according to the law of the country.
Rahman of the country visited Britain the MQM leader, Altaf Hussain, in response to a question about the meeting, The prime minister said Rahman allowed the country to London.
Quetta, four policemen were killed including DSP
file photo
Quetta in shooting by unknown people on a highway seryaab road a DSP, Deputy Police, including four police officers.
On Wednesday morning, Two of the DSP in a jeep, a police inspector and two constables were on the training center that seryaab Degree College located on the road of unknown attackers on a motorcycle near police jeep on started firing all inspector, Mehdi and Constable were killed on the spot when a DSP Hassan Ali died after reaching hospital.
Hospital sources said that severely injured and the other DSP Ghulam condition is serious and shot them in the head and neck.
After the incident, police surrounded the area has not yet claimed the responsibility of the incident.
The death of Indian software engineer and one in the United States
Andhra Pradesh in the United States belonging to a software shot and killed by unknown attackers.
Living in 26 years old Akashi two days before the state unknown in hit a bullet during the medical treatment in the hospital. The Wisla died.
He it employee of computers and in the United States, jet was working.
In Andhra Pradesh last year from the seven student in the United States, at the hands of social elements have been killed.
Higher Education and Employment in the United States for the students of the increasing deaths have created thousands of families in the province children living in the United States.
noted that the higher education and a better future for the United States in Andhra Pradesh is given priority.
Chennai in south India, according to the statistics of the US consulate US visa for one million every year are taking 40 percent, The most in Andhra Pradesh.
During the provincial government started efforts to bring a body of the deceased.
The enemy of the United States against the attacks of Are: Bush
President George W. Bush his weekly speech last week in the United States has stressed that the enemy attacks against the.
Mr. Bush said that the Americans still for the biggest threat of terrorists and attack. And he warned that the enemies of the country are waiting with patience. and he again to.
Shoulder The president said the United States must never should not be negligent of their safety.
President Bush also expressed best wishes for the next President of Barak Obama, who in his post on Tuesday combined.
Barak Obama, the newly elected President of the Democratic Party in his speech on the radio on Saturday by taking ceremony on the historical importance of light.
He said that this ceremony is a tradition which has the power to other leaders, A leader of the greatness of US peace with very deep.
Mr. Obama reminded That all over the world, many people in this can not even that the leader of the carnage or conflict without the power to abandon.
Raiwind Sharif brothers and the Federal Interior Minister meeting, exchanged views on political and security affairs
Starting from the opposition and ruling party in Punjab, head of the Pakistan Muslim League, Nawaz Sharif and federal interior minister Ashaar Raiwind in a meeting on Sunday between the country's in Punjab Chief Minister Shahbaz Sharif were also present.
According to the local media Ashaar had brought no important message of the Pakistan People's Party under the leadership of the country.
However, Speaking to journalists after the meeting in this regard Ashaar country has revealed no details and only said that political issues with the approval of the politics is, and the city after the Mumbai attacks on the leadership is given a briefing.
In their words: 'so far provide As much Information about The operation.
Remember that there has been a large operation in Punjab and the Punjab government and is still in the team is formed in the Punjab government, in need of help.
Ashaar said that every day, the media said, But the daily from the leadership exchange. Meanwhile, spokesman of the Pakistan Muslim League, Rashid, Also in the political affairs, refusing to disclose and said that Ashaar tell the country was told.
made it clear that Pakistan Muslim League met with the leadership of the Missouri home, at a time when that warm summer of politics in the Punjab government against the Q, More than 20 administrators who belonged to the Punjab Governor Salman along with the press conference of the United States, on behalf of the steps of the provincial government, rejecting the criticism of the Pakistan People's Party belonging to the governor of Punjab objection on the participation in this matter.
's speech is a welcome step for Pakistan: President Zardari
Pakistani President Asif Ali Zardari, The new President of the United States Ehud Barak Obama said that they welcomed the opening address of the Muslim world with mutual interests and respect for the people of Pakistan and is a welcome step.
Brought In a statement issued on Wednesday said that the US president on behalf of the principles and values of Chief reiterated the hope of a better future for the people of the world.
According to the statement, The President Zardari said that the United States together with the international community in the 21st century, peace, development and it is important responsibility to find new paths of the empire.
It should be noted that President Obama said in the opening speech after taking the oath of office on Tuesday that the United States wants new progress with the Muslim world, which is based on mutual respect and mutual interests.
Brought had assured the people in poor countries that will work together with the United States so social development and poverty reduction.
President Obama has appointed a special representative for Afghanistan and Pakistan.
Richard Hall The United Nations for former Hall has been appointed as special representative for Afghanistan and Pakistan.
Hall The Bosnian Gregan had played an important role in the peace agreement.
Hall said that they are ready for consultations with President Obama on the issues of Afghanistan and Pakistan.
He that it is not an easy task.
He said that the history of the two countries is very different.
George macal for the Middle East has been elected Arab Israel will try to life in peace talks.
Former senator and he had played a role in establishing peace in Northern Ireland.
Today, while talking in the State Department said that the Middle East situation is very unstable, complicated and dangerous.
But in spite of this, The United States will not back down from the peace efforts there.
Afghanistan: voter registration was in danger.
Afghanistan's Election Commission has said that he is worried about the security of the delay in voter registration in some areas of the south.
statements in south Afghanistan near the voter registration for the presidential election began this week.
But the commission has said that as long as the security situation will not be better Halmand province in some areas of the voter register themselves will not be able to get in.
Last year in violence is on the rise in those areas of the south, where Taliban rebels have increased their attack on Afghan forces and international forces.
During this time, Afghan forces and international forces has said that he has between Wednesday and Thursday night at least 28 militants killed during the clashes in Afghanistan.
Nato has said that his forces have killed 22 militants in air and ground attacks in eastern Khost province near the Pakistan border.
Prior to this, the Afghan defense ministry said that Afghan forces in the province had eight rebels were killed and two injured.
It is not clear whether the Afghan officials The incident the reference.
Two missile attack, At least 18 people killed in Waziristan
Pakistan intelligence officials in North Waziristan, has said that two suspected US missile attacks At least 18 people have been killed.
According to the officials, who US planes, three missile on a house near the town of Mir Ali in North Waziristan, which killed 10 people in the house.
Five foreign war in the people who were killed According to local officials.
The region is believed to be the center of the fighters of Taliban and al Qaeda.
Some of this incident in South Waziristan After a missile attack, in which at least eight people were killed.
Despite the objections of the Pakistani government in Pakistan since the middle of last year have been missile attack near 30.
Recent attacks in the United States President Ehud Barak Obama after coming to power in the first attack.
The Bush administration claimed responsibility for the attacks, or to abstain from the opposite.
In North Waziristan tribal region of Pakistan on Friday, suspected American three missile launchers from the plane in which five have yet.
Of those killed have not been identified.
According to Initial Information, The missile Attack On a House in The area of Mir Ali.
think that Ehud after becoming president of the first missile attack in Pakistan's tribal area
The NWFP government ban on girls' education in Swat rejected the demand of
NWFP authorities have threatened to impose a ban on girls' education by Taliban militants in Swat rejected by saying that it is against the law and both announced.
Education Minister of the NWFP, Sardar Hussain Babar said on Sunday that the government do such efforts will not be successful.
They said that extremists are trying to our children deprived of education in the region.
In their words: 'these people hiding schools and operandi to children.
While mentioning the atmosphere of fear and panic, the provincial government said that this is well and make it clear is that no power The remaining land could not stop the development of education.
A day earlier, Maulana Fazal under leadership of Taliban militants have demanded a ban on girls' education in the educational institutions of Swat from January 15 and threatened to break that the educational institutions will be destroyed.
Swat despite the military operation in the educational institutions during the past half year of 150 militants exploded the explosive material from setting destroyed.
educational institutions to be destroyed as a result of thousands of girls and boys in education in the facility.
Strict security measures on the occasion of the anniversary of the republic in India
India on Monday in the 60th anniversary of the republic is being observed, very tough of all security measures and thousands of troops have been deployed in the country.
Republic Day on the occasion of exhibition of weapons during the military parade in New Delhi, aircraft and other military equipments.
Officials say that security arrangements under the anti aircraft battery and sharp, and police have been deployed on the parade routes, The American President Ehud Barak Obama has extended congratulations on this occasion to India
, Prime Minister Manmohan Singh on Saturday was a heart operation as soon as the message of the recovery of.
think that yesterday after two suspected Pakistani militants fighting in the outskirts of New Delhi, The Indian police claimed to have killed.
According to local officials, the police from both of these people AK the grenades and some documents have been recovered, which show that both Pakistani.
Police are also investigating whether they belong to the banned organization of Pakistan army, which was involved in the Mumbai attacks in November last year.
Tea: effective treatment of breast cancer
A new research said that three cup of tea daily
Drinking less than 50 years old, more than a third of the risk of breast cancer in women.
The US state of Florida cancer Center in the research, said that 50 years of age of breast cancer in women's tumor
In danger of 37 percent goes to at least three cup of tea.
Research was also told that the aged women for three or more cup of tea daily. There is no particular interest in this regard.
Experts believe that this is due to the presence of the components in tea, which is special kind of cancer are more and more effective against the target of General women under the age of 50.
Florida State in the city of Tampa in cancer Center in research on more than five thousand women who had been breast cancer treatment.
They were between 20 and 74 years of age.
Experts compare his medical records and life style women with breast cancer were safe.
Experts also found that a special kind of cancer,, the tea at the And 66 percent reduction.
Breast cancer patients every tenth of this kind.
For this type of cancer is more dangerous because he is In depth and usually is shown at this time when it has spread.
Experts that regularly daily at least three cup of tea drinking age can reduce the risk of breast cancer in women,
said that tea drink of a daily in their daily routines to include the appropriate against cancer in the body from the Created.
In Britain every year and about 40 thousand the diagnosis of breast cancer in women.
The war in Afghanistan, The United States is the biggest military challenge:
US Defense Minister Robert has said that the war in Afghanistan is the biggest military challenge faced by the United States.
Today the US Senate and the war on Afghanistan and Iraq to members of the representatives briefing about the administration's strategy.
told the Senate Armed Services Committee that the war is not the solution of the issue of Afghanistan, but brought further said that a number of areas to secure a sufficient number of forces are not present, for the benefit of the gaze of the Taliban.
A reduction in the exercise with the age of why?
New research
Exercise in every age is good for health.
This strong to the heart of the decrease in the level of cholesterol in less weight, to a beginning, help to stop diabetes and obliviousness to slow the process of.
Unfortunately, a lot of people in the age of the ability to exercise with the decrease in the.
Experts said that the exercise of our body and mind sharp, However, CAN Influence ON This.
Of the American Medical Association that exercise not many health problems to come.
Mayo Clinic mini cudgel of Dr. payroll Lika says that the increase in the age of disability and physical performance of the exercise is a big reason.
Dr. Mayo Clinic medicine are starving.
He aged heart diseases and the leadership of a study about the ability of the exercise.
The performance of the team of doctors to review the voice of the high waves use.
In which the shrinkage of the heart to pump blood, study of the rest.
Experts have to focus on the Left Part of the heart, which is a central part of the pump.
They came to know that the increase in the age of the heart disorders in the rest of the increase.
Dr. Patricia says that along with the increase in the age of abuses in the process, and the rest with the ability to exercise its Influence OVER IT.
Dr. cans were included in the study.
They say that we see this that is essentially the impact of this thing and it clarified that the exercise in the heart of the performance of the rest of the process of how much is concerned.
Sometimes blood pressure and heart ills in the process of can cause of diseases.
If doctors and patients about the ills Of The Heart should work together, they can get the benefits of exercise in spite of the increase.
A detailed report in this regard, The American Medical Association has been published in the magazine.
No possibility of an immediate war with Pakistan: Indian army chief
Indian army chief General Dipak Kapoor says that the war with Pakistan is not likely, However, to the defense of the country and to ensure the protection of the interests of the sacrifices to all the time.
General Kapoor, alleged that the assurances and Mumbai attacks despite the international pressure on Pakistan, In the words of the structure of terrorism on the land of Pakistan, not only as the situation there is active.
The talking to reporters in Srinagar.
Head of the Indian army in Kashmir under the New Delhi to review the security situation and preparation of the armed forces on the borders of the total aid on a fast visit of Kashmir.
was asked a question that, According to media reports about the Mumbai attacks in Pakistan has rejected the silent presented by the Indian side, about their comment.
General Kapoor said that the decision of war or peace issues the political leadership.
On Pakistan's soil while Referring to the presence of The Infrastructure OF Terrorism, They have said that peace Will Be faced with Such Elements OF the Indian Army Upside Down and Weak TO India on.
Brought on the land of Indian Kashmir said that seven to eight hundred militants are in about 50 percent of the foreign.
General Dipak Kapoor said that with the improvement in the weather in the efforts of infiltration from Pakistan and Kashmir under the May, However, India has increased vigilance on the borders.
The Indian Kashmir under the possibility of the reduction in the number of forces stationed in rejected by saying that there can be no agreement with the security of the country.
God the language of and for be,
Although is not see and the United States leads to a great extent this change of in our favor.
That Mr. Barak, who is the dream of Martin Luther Keng to interpretation.
Reportedly part of the name of Hussein, today, as the US president to take oath where all historical as history. another test.
Not only his personal secure, but for all the people who have heart to support.
This will be Majority also is not easy to accept these defections to the heart of a black for him.
South Asia here have raised hopes to young should remember that he has been elected President of the United States and should remember that the president of the United States in a practical manner President.
Now a little after a person who's racial, the brother of slavery wearing their alma were brought to the United States from the country and reportedly blood the term of the new state of the world, to today is the victim of racial discrimination, the representative of the nation will be Togare President of the United States.
This one have been many expectations of the people,
Her lover on those who it is that this person realistic hopes Not to establish.
If like race, religion in the world on the basis of spreading hatred to the success in, it will be the victory of the eradication.
This change from South Asia filled will happening meaningful change in American policy in this regard can be expected.
On relations between Pakistan and the United States will affect how this change.
'BBC
Tons, or any, estimation of the policy and to determine the nature of relations, billion, Bo, strong, Influential AND Influence of The jewish Lobby.
And as far as Pakistan is concerned, recently in connection with the Mumbai blasts, India, Israel, The United States and the triangle of aggressive attitude in front of the whole world.
Pakistan for quite a while After Swat controlled all of the responsibility of the Swat a regular army and law.
He handed the sins of Swat under an agreement of the government.
But regret that our governments with the Swat treated like mother.
No increase in the number of schools after the end of the government of the Swat in Swat
And there's interest in construction and development.
At present, The number of those girls who were the education several times in the past.
Pakistan's North West Frontier Province, the local educational institutions by the Taliban to set the target is continuing.
Most of the school have been destroyed in Swat district, in which most of the girls.
Not just the Taliban ban on girls' education in Swat has been announced.
Thousands of students and are deprived of education.
What do you think that the girls want to get out of links to the Taliban.
Why the government failed to stop illegal measures until now.
You think the government should do.
The question should be that the ISI and the Pakistani will get.
Because the people of Swat this game has come to understand that the army is not to kill them for the service of the Taliban, otherwise the curfew in the same night five school How can be slaughtered to people in the curfew in the city's main square.
Swat when the writ of the government not being given to stop illegal steps in the government, how successful?
Now the question that has been the armed forces, The latest arms, modern technology and reconnaissance system, all of the government, The four Taliban control, why not?
Whoever is that on the head of a 'secret' hand Monday that these weapons, and is not only are arrested.
sum that the Taliban black through the work of the world colonialism, are easy.
Fifteen years ago was the war in Afghanistan
ISI was to control the Taliban and the opposition Northern Alliance was to help Russia, India and Iran.
Then all of a sudden, the situation change before the achievement of Taliban
And ISI to America to offer of abundance so the former friend will become the enemy.
Now the situation is that the war is still going on, but to help Iran, India and Russia.
As long as human beings in this sense, and that what is right and wrong, still is a human mistake.
, for example, when a thief on theft to it if it is at this time to think, not a good thing to theft and theft is a menace, the punishment from God and is be ', they will not stealing human beings
Similarly, until Israel not to be that I was wrong and of bloodshed and I am the punishment will get in Gaza holy will be playing with the blood.
Etiquette!
The question that war, armed movement, terrorism is the solution of the problems?
If not, then he chemistry, which is to solve the problems?
fanatic way, that this war does not solve problems but more 'blessing'.
Palestine, Afghanistan and Iraq, to secure the success of his movements to adopt the same model, which was adopted by Nelson Mandela of South Africa.
Armed struggle, More than moral struggle and personal Jihad.
Kashmiris to take part in the election is that he has to accept.
The third week of Israeli attacks on Gaza and the number of deaths reached one thousand.
Despite the international diplomatic efforts, The war could not be
Interaction, According to the estimate, starting from December 27 after the attacks so far 90 thousand Palestinians left their home have been transferred to safe areas.
On the other hand, The relief agencies, accusing Israel of commitment of Palestinian children from the protection of the issue, said that an entire generation of Palestinian children will be serious psychological and emotional problems.
What do you say.
What should be done?
How lasting peace is possible in Gaza?
Click here for details
Please note criterion that comments due to an increase in the number of the opinions of the letter will be published in Urdu.
online for the screen on the board Alt shift by pressing Urdu.
Taliban given a chance pavernent
Basit, Peshawar
Fortunes go if the Taliban began to jihad, by the innocent people who will.
Girls' school who burnt?
And kidnapping for ransom or no ransom, the US intelligence by saying the Poles, who will bureaucracy?
much damage to the Taliban, as did not suffer any nation or religion.
Pashtun
Costa Pakistan
All attacks on Israel by the Islamic world if only threat to give, you will see that Israel's father in how the United States will be hurt
immediately and not the real war only, but will also be the war.
But what we have to do our Muslim rulers in the heart, liver, where.
Any Ahmadi to say that you are the big boom of your courage in the forum of the BBC.
The responsibility of peace and human rights on the Arabs, or not only Hindus and Muslims of the world, but it is the duty of the nations of the world that the voice against.
This tragic incident so far for the sins of Bush in the worst.
June 30 in India and Pakistan, before the end of the financial year in government institutions, just like a green signal to Israel before the end of the American administration, which is that the choice.
On the one hand, The United States says that the war will be tried
On the other hand, The UN resolution is passed a resolution, But the two didn't do anything, It is only one point to the Muslims that the United Nations for the fighting.
All Muslim countries should pay to the end and the membership of the United Nations and its harms the foundation of the International Organization.
We have many examples, where the only promises and resolutions of the United Nations and the United States are only of Muslims.
His What is the benefit of when the BBC is not some strike.
Now all press freedoms in principle where buried blood unjustly, particularly the flowing of Muslims on the BBC, can be.
Though accounting deprived of the right of
themselves some burst, The fact that the comments of meanness,
From Muslims.
In you and the Jews, so he is Jewish, Muslim, and you as Muslims living in his Muslim say the Muslims
[syja786
BBC for quite a long period of suicide attacks in a special schools are being targeted in the pretext of terrorism in India,
His remarks against Islam is the favorite word of extremism
But extremists who is it you over the comments of the well scepticism about writing against Iran in its has been.
US Muslims will come to understand that can not face to the sword.
Israel's bombing in the heart of the unarmed people not cried tears of blood, then what?
But basic guilty of murder and violence, which is the name of jihad and the beautiful face of Islam meet.
When the majority of the Palestinians have accepted the existence of Israel, Hamas that he needed rockets on Israel or suicide attacks.
attitude of both sides humanity Ki.
The role of the United States and the United Nations and then we supported Israel's atrocities.
God a, The Amen,
Terrorism and terrorists of this action of terrorism and delivered of Nobel to think that real work,.
Otherwise, what terrorism on a large scale without lenses Sardar generation of the And it is who are all know.
, such grandfather in plain language, Gary said that the fire.
Great Fico to killed and crying, even.
medicines for the injured, funeral for those killed and money, are Arab rulers and is being asked.
Israeli attack, what should be done?
This issue is that the heads of all Muslim countries, including Saudi negligence while sleeping in his army is and no defense plan, think that aid was his responsibility.
them immediately to practical steps against Israel.
As the United States and European countries But the closure of petrol in their grief.
All brothers and sisters to salute!
I think Hamas to stop its struggle in the name of peace in this difficult time to give advice to thousands of widows and hundreds of thousands of people injustice and to prove him failed.
If Israel and its supporters are on the rise of its arrogance, near Musa also will be Born in his house because it is the law of fertilizer in the suicide bomber in the Muslims of America and Israel are working.
The power of intoxicate could not understand the elephants.
Abu Abdullah,
Now Hamas and Israel should take a compromise so that blood and harm closed.
Mohammad Sarfaraz, Paris, France
Just rang.
Duty to do with that Hamas is on the percentage of truth and '' Jihad 'against the court in' call, if he wants to, to say the least, should know that if the died home, then love is not good.
People who love of God, the love of the Prophet, and claimed his religion of love, to love human part of faith.
As Muslims after the People of the Book, 'live in the world, is ordered to Allah
Najib Rehman Sayako, Lahore [P @ KI T @ N
No order is not but ordered them to the invitation of Islam
But questioning conspiring against the order of jihad against them
With them to fold the time until the determination not destroyed but it does not mean that wearing a jacket burst in
Brothers, killer of children is the destruction.
But my friends to the Israelis that the shelter was not, today he was so strong that no one in the world because the Jews are.
The Shiite, Sunni, all Jewish and he made every thing of the development in every field.
On the contrary, what is the condition of 55 Islamic countries?
Back in every field and now it is that so that the enemy are killed and they are waiting for the death.
It is necessary that all Muslim countries to be united and together against Israel ready.
Feroz Magsi, Jhang, Pakistan
And not a good strategy and that Israel should accept the, modern science and the ways of development after learning to live in peace and China to the world.
Have the land of the Muslims and Sources.
Is correct.
First of all, this tragic aspect is that Hamas and Fatah could not be alliance.
Yasir Arafat and Sheikh Yasin as world leaders organized way for this was that the mosque praying for jihad to the region, The only attribute the nation can be weak and until Yasin and Arafat are not removed from the way it was impossible.
The world can see that these two leaders as Palestine after the death of the Is
And the Jewish lobby moment to moment how their clutches upgraded the NSG, Most of the.
A Pakistani prime minister in 1974, the owner of the world, for the first time in history that 100 percent with the attendance of all Muslim leaders had come under one roof.
Today the birth anniversary on it is a difficult task that this nation will pledge that not only will keep unity among its ranks
But also other differences of the Muslims, while it the establishment of Islamic Commonwealth of accomplishing the mission will be?
This one, which is half a century to Has
This, many of which are mouth
Many times it from any other source, on your bad circumstances world pressure and Paddy.
And the other face in Iraq, Afghanistan, Iran, Pakistan, are
And the most of which because it knows that it when he was pulled and only firm religion of Islam, Muslims and Muslims and Islam will be expelled because history shows that Islam is the big are on the right path
Israel war planes by a series of bombings and missile attacks on Gaza from December 27.
In these attacks so far more than three hundred Palestinian citizens have been killed.
Air attacks after the Israeli tanks and armored vehicles have reached on the borders of Gaza with the preparation of the action on the ground.
In an emergency meeting of the UN Security Council has unanimously passed resolution by Israel and the Palestinian Authority to immediately demanded to stop violent activities.
, However, Israeli officials said that they will continue their operations in Gaza until they are not sure that it will be closed for rocket attacks on Israel.
In your opinion what Israel is correct to say that this action is an attempt to defend the unity and integrity of Israel?
This situation is to play their role in the international community?
This aggressive action of indirect belong to the next elections in Israel?
The newly elected President of the United States Barak Obama after assuming the post of the Middle East can be expected of the improvement in the situation?
Please note criterion that comments due to an increase in the number of the opinions of the letter will be published in Urdu.
online for the screen on the board Alt shift by pressing Urdu.
Palestine, There is a holy place for Muslims all over the world and this part of compulsory for US.
And we should also remember that they tone is first
India and Israel fail a day to the United States, because this country became only the for these unbelievers and the punishment is the Sajid Sadiq,
When tears from the pretext is night
When no one from only prayers Nawabzada Nasrullah Khan
Such comments, BBC Research published by the discovery.
Last of and maintain the impression.
Of BBC News are only correct, But the real thing is the news.
What to do and what is the importance of the news.
And so on and so forth.
Zaheer Chughtai
This now our Pakistani electronic Parana media, especially and columnists now are not behind the increasing extremism and terrorism here or in the coverage of the writing on it, 'revenge' in the trunk whipped.
said the United Nations, which apparently, human rights and peace talks but the Muslims of oppression and tyranny, and his mouth are heard the same words that Hamas should stop attacks for how long this dual policy will continue.
Muslims as why such violence if people like the United States is backing of Jews left, then God Almighty has clearly said that this nation will spent the most miserable life of the nation and the nation is life if the courage, The United States, backing and then see that the life of his fortune
Called the world and Murder in the name of peace fell to should clearly understand that set up the peace and justice in the world. is cordoned injustice and genocide.
If the genocide in any nation can be eliminated to administer the results can be achieved, after the Jews of not only maintain existence. but, in a way, the peak of bargain impossible today.
According to Poet
Cruelty is growing, totally.
Blood is, Jim.
Who will tell what is terrorism?
What all this terrorism is not in about their seems to all the
People What are not or of only Low has been of what was not of
And now from anywhere any condolence him am not?
Mumbai attacks in the proceedings of the was seen such as this in my house fire that of sparing never saw it and it sparing lenses do not wish a think
Dead bodies on the road, fend injured and in the blood innocent face condemned How did not find that words
Regret on the psychology of the Muslims is that on one hand, the evidence on the entire world of people killed in India action that is otherwise we will
And on the other hand, Israel publicly the genocide of Muslims and the silence of the world It is unbearable.
God have long darkness, and when the storm will be the end of the city.
The United States, hence the integrity of Israel is a joke.
As far as the elections, The ruling public response in this kind of actions for the course Israel, like the rest of the state of Barak Obama, history is evident today was not against any US government policy and will not be colonialism is white or black colonialism.
Forum in this debate is clear to everyone that the pain of Benazir Bhutto's death, but as a politician was not ignore their shortcomings.
This debate is that Benazir Bhutto lives for the sake of democracy, or for the sake of power.
If democracy was Aziz American clearance and 10 years until the deal in Musharraf's dictatorship to the public Why leave kept?
Benazir Bhutto then Pakistan not come when the dictatorship unfortunately he needed to come to Pakistan when they release with cases and ensured the power.
Historical servants to the accusations by the Is being not to say anything on this.
Sana Khan
Some things are ignored, thinking that some of them may not be.
Another reader
Respected / Mrs. you may not only in Pakistan but the history Sir may also read in my friend countries and seven other countries about the Saeco's right to you.
Tariq Ayaz
'not only to which he training, not
Was thriving in the water and armpit, of which
Britain has never has also Hindu and Muslim issue invention which the development of Sir Syed.

How cruel, our nation and our party in the state of writes, are blind, but now, every historic virtues intellectuals to pick up the allegations and is being criticized, Some say.
We have developed a lot.
Sana Khan
Some things are ignored, thinking, that some of them may not be load books, to not be the Fool
Although after the attack of the dialogue process between Pakistan and India has been interrupted, so we want to continue the talks between Pakistan and India.
If the war will be, will be a loss of human lives from both sides.
said that attack in Mumbai of India, was arrested in Pakistan and it has sent a letter to Pakistan in writing, but on the other hand, India when the extremist arrested, said that this is a very big engineer, But after he had only four party is declared.
First of all, approve the forum and all Christian Friends of the Christmas.
Colleagues of the forum: Saeco, Raza, Sana, sister and sister Shahida Akram and etiquette.
We all want peace but not the fires of flowers.
War itself is a problem
War will solve the issues
Fire and blood today will
hunger and poverty will tomorrow
Knowledgeable people for
War, is better
And in our area
candle burning, is better
India relations now have very deep, and India is certainly know that time if the United States to open will.
Of the United States, the old.
When the Indian attack in the United States will get its objectives and India will be spent.
Should Pakistan that it will announce that we will not take the initiative, But the aggression, then initiate peace will not be until this time of war and India are not completely damaged or take over whether we ourselves for it, why not be destroyed.
This is the Islamic history.
This resolution before the Pakistani people and army to give the message he is given.
Attacks In the restitution of diplomatic and military benefits of the achievement of the Indian efforts to more than droll party are even if the initial strong international reaction on the contrary of the world pressure on Pakistan.
Shouting to India for the United Nations, expressed satisfaction at Pakistan's efforts and the international pool, The head of Pakistan's efforts to applaud the diplomacy of the side of the '.
No Two opinion on this matter that this is a very brutal act.
But the question is that when the attackers were on thousands of Taliban Monday Sami ninety, where the Pakistani army was and what was?
The accountability of the army should not be in a year that he has done?
Every day, which thousands of shells of tanks and mortars in the uneasy with how many Taliban were killed?
ISI In I appeal to harm the Taliban left and the US in Swat, to live in peace.
And the forgery operation.
In the United Nations, the day will come when such resolution of the military intervention in Pakistan as party have against.
Riaz Ahmed Farooqi
First, all the evidence and the reason for his action against extremists and their supporters are being provided and, the day a resolution was presented, chances are that no voice in the United Nations will not got in our favor.
And accepting this time in the possession of the resolution, the example of the United States, no one will run under the help of any power.
Sami Monday with God's personality and achievements we have knowledge AND Information THAT The activities OF this.
They were not a revolutionary.
Which comrade, The chairman of the, Nawab Bugti, Dr. Najib desecration of thousands of dead bodies of the revolutionaries and the enemy's hands.
They are also condemned to die.
But there is an international game being played here, horror and brutality people afraid of the rule.
So that the reason could be that if we will create such inhuman and government will.
Called on the name of Islam the movement of militants.
These extremists, the supporters of the oppression of the United States, and they like it, But instead of regret on the brutal actions they named as tribal traditions. clean mining fish.
Scares tribal traditions of Capote end with the name of Islam The reason of this type of barbaric action may not be to the heart.
I think the people of our army found with them.
So that when the people are in this time, close to catch it, will be the timetable, But they go on, if they are there, the darn from there.
These people so that they are brave 50 to 70 men hostage and our army as supporting this is like the spectators.
The Servants of Allah and the army.
It is clear that in the black.
priestcraft, time Ziaul, graciousness and God's mercifulness during the dictatorship of the qualities of the kinds of and of fear in the name of religion, set up the atmosphere has seen the dead body in the incident of literature and the books like 'will be made after the death of Created.
And only the worldly and dignity and the fear of Jalal as equipment or are using.
'!
hell to you, It is threatened
himself became the fear '
surprising when it is said that this can not be a Muslim.
We themselves from history or to ignore.
Wisal declined after the Prophet on prophet who has seen the closed door fire and her husband in the guy who dragged him out?
They came from outside?
Medina on army invasion of Yazid and Since the Karbala cronies and assuaged of?
Facts without accepting the motives are not countered.
BBC Walt dual policy closed.
This topic with better Super title: 'Bush of the shoes were legitimate or illegitimate?
'should be
, Japan
Yar some shame, A man out of the grave electric was specific projects that have raised voice against the oppression, and the subject of box office is lying to you.
lion-hearted operation for the success of the operation on the other side of the border and the Line of success, depends on the incident is in favor of the opinion of the common people.
This step is American and Pakistani agencies and Monday, was the victim of a conspiracy.
Comments in this forum will be based on the Taliban because the secret to success in the Taliban have been included those steps could change the opinion of the common people.
In only ask to be kidnapping that when a whole day for the body reactor, the army was the only people to make new there some statement that this is' bombardment on the whereabouts of Taliban, due to his mother and two children, were killed.
The did not know about the trip?
Or was the sport?
By the hand and request that God to secure the game off.
Are you a ruling on the end.
Was Asked by the BBC Question may not be good writing It is sad to see the superficialness, for example, The question has not asked that 30 thousand soldiers in Swat to do?
The bodies of those who fight with Taliban backer of the army Poles throughout the day on.
Swati green step with the people of the Pakistani army has what, what, but media including the BBC has also did not maintain a good knowledge of the reality to the real world.
The Pakistani army drama.
Swat child that is that this is a bloody drama.
Pay bus drama.
The Taliban have the name of the Muslims.
If true Muslims in the whole world not say why these terrorists to place in the area.
Which becomes the honor to work hard and do not pay the guns are included in the group.
Gun or the sword of Islam.
Shame.
Its justification is not in any religion in a family tradition.
Media including the BBC and Taliban, about his comments from various sources.
To know the real situation, but it is not right situation, we know because we are tribal.
posed a play that has succumbed to the crashed, a raw, and our own crashed an ISI are no student is not the tribal of bad elements, who are Taliban, schools, Pashtun people, tribes and tribal traditions are notorious.
With this move, head of all Muslims.
MQM, Altaf Hussain, The leader of the ANC and the leadership of the PPP I salute against this cancer, is against the Taliban.
Cancer is a product of Zia ul Haq, Pakistan but he himself, were also destroyed.
But I am hopeful that the present leadership to end this cancer.
India said that Pakistan is behind these attacks after the Mumbai attacks Some of the extremist elements.
Pakistan has denied the charges and said that he will take every possible help in the investigation.
said that India has given Pakistan a list in which they are given the names of suspected extremists, who are wanted by India.
Pakistan has said that Maulana Masood Azhar, head of US Mohammed included in the list are not suspects and There Is no Information about The government in Pakistan.
Prior to this, Asif Ali Zardari, The President of Pakistan has rejected the impression that Western intelligence agencies and the Indian government to provide evidence about the Mumbai attacks.
President Zardari Ajmal Butcher said that it has not been proven that they are Pakistani.
During this time, Prime Minister Manmohan Singh warned Pakistan that India's relations with still better can not as long as the land will be used for terrorism.
And the latest developments in India cricket team has cancelled his visit to Pakistan.
His Political Influence On the SPORTS SHOULD occur?
You see the future of relations between Pakistan and India.
Pakistan to the United States will not India.
Pakistan, The Pakistani.
So after sectarian and priestcraft regionalism what you expect.
Though Jinnah has also proved not this time with the Muslims of India.
Yasmin, Chicago
Mrs. if Jinnah continues work on his vision, not regionalism, and priestcraft cancer in Pakistan and not treated with Muslims in India.
But our mistake is that they could not create a leader.
If we can not the value of their heroes
There are many capabilities in the region.
God knows when wisdom and agreed with the blessing of the development of the region.
In both countries, pundit, Taliban, Shiv Sena, RSS, the enemy of peace have been prepared.
And powers that this region with the peace progress, therefore, these countries to small round.
You can imagine that this area with Pakistan, India and China will be a place in the World.
Pakistan is the punishment of God, the thieves and robbers otherwise the militants on the Leader of the nation.
God will not affect our country on Pakistan, Amen.
But the little eyes open around the situation and see the facts on the ground, you will find that where US forces have been reached.
This foreign affairs also are not correct, border situation of Karachi in Sindh and Baluchistan, in front of you.
In such a situation, A leader of the country we need to make a united nation.
Or the mercy of God.
I think is no way without a war.
Enough is enough already.
Now the issue should be or Cross.
Talks issued the will not solve the problem.
Small terror in each other's countries.
End to Europe, was declared after the last great war.
And this war was not great, all the altercation altercation of Pakistan and India Today.
Our almost all the political parties agree on mine that should be an end to terrorism and sectarianism from the country.
But do not see our sincere in military leadership, on the one hand, The United States and Europe has been assured that we are with you in this war against terrorism, On the other hand, the Taliban also help.
We think now is to determine its direction and only one is to choose the path of, thanks
This is no doubt that the majority of these workers of the army in the audio, declared that the army freezes to the audio Pakistan were included in the name of the party,
However after the workers preferred to the relief work and now India strongly demand the United Nations to continue crackdown against them and the government of Pakistan has also banned.
In my opinion, if the jihadi groups, religious extremism and religious and relief operations continue, the better.
In Pakistan organizations who in the name of jihad professionalism criminals Paul people have this and of 'big' are the same which And what to say.
Now leaving no stone to Pakistan.
In this Muslim, human not entitled to.
Pakistan from insurgents without national security will be in danger.
Was still think the capacity of the NOT BE BANNED?
fanatic are no place anywhere in the world of work is murder.
This news with the thief is be a thief.
This what the world is an important member of the religion of Islam that is difficult to live in this world today for the name.
Non Muslim can kill Muslims, but also try to take revenge if Muslim, all of the Muslim world, with all its insincere ruling also get the same treatment as the pain of honest and sincere, who are with our great leader Hafiz Saeed.
Revenge of the attacks in Mumbai, India.
Born in ties between Pakistan and a severe blow to the improvement in relations between the two countries in recent years.
India is hold responsible for military and foreign military groups active in Pakistan
And the relations would return to normal is being linked to the action against these groups.
While the Indian security agencies for the Mumbai attacks, stayed to directly responsible.
, in this regard, before the name of joy.
This is not the first time that any terrorist action in India because of the relations between the two countries have been serious.
After the attack on the Indian parliament in December 2001, The two neighboring on the brink of war.
Since then, banned in 2002 and was included in the list of terrorist groups.
Now party, in which security analyst, says that in the new feature, is being demanded the ban.
In your opinion, should be imposed the ban on the group or not?
Pakistan should take decisive action against active extremist groups on its soil?
The party imposed ban on the present to India.
Pakistan crisis can get out of the way and the stop of armed groups for the lasting peace between the two countries is how necessary?
Of the UN Security Council, The party has imposed a ban on the end of the Security Council, the evidence on which so the hurry?
No activity against Muslims in the Security Council?
It says that the plaintiff witness slowly forward.
If India itself has become a failed state.
The intelligence, the army and other security institutions have failed, which some terrorists in the hands of the 72 hours of dance, dance and India accused Pakistan of this failure at the world has been deceived.
A dissident murder be noise in the whole world is liable why the double standard?
To only of our country,, welfare organization.
Furqan Farooq, Faisalabad
Until our Mir the Prophet, Saint scholars and all people love and respect Islam, peace to spread and.
Muslims in every field of development.
This beautiful religion to exaggerate The priestcraft Momin and discrimination of infidel began and the opening of a new chapter of the storm, which was not aware before the world.
salute. to Mr. wants to, but this action on the bill.
Under pressure from the United States.
If India is to provide evidence, no?
Why does not He?
And every thing, why we put?
In India, extremist groups and organizations, why not accusing the ban these people?
We are all over the world, in a terrorist?
India in Kashmir, which is what is he?
Israel, which is what is he?
It is true that we are the world's first nuclear Islamic state, why are the same case.
Pakistan is in its last stages.
kamranhassan, ABU DHABI
Your heart, and some conditions of the are coming
Now, The American magazines in with Pakistan's new plan is set to be published and it is coming to a part of the rotation of the sanctions.
US slowly but not very fast, its grip on the NSG.
In such a situation, if we did not do as a demonstration of the unity of the nation, too, if Bangladesh can also can be a lot of things.
Scare around any condemnation of the attacks, He is, whether they are in a hotel in Mumbai or Islamabad in Palestine or in the hotel.
Terrorists like this, where they also should be the end of it, The Pakistani, Indian and American and Israeli.
Now the question is that every day are terrorist attacks in Pakistan, hundreds of people were killed, including the Pakistani authorities on why the world is silent?
The Maria was not of the terrorist attack on the hotel was
Then why.
Devoted go Missouri home Rahman, the country,, how many were strong and!
, According to the BBC, where a committee of the United Nations Security Council, The party imposed a ban on the country, says that we are not banned, and it will be after a lot of thought and consideration
Not only this, According to the BBC, the country qualified to this impression with the full force has denied that any of the arrests of terrorists, are being brought in the process.
OK, God!
The ability to keep or not, or did not want to say.
We are fighting a war of the Pakistan.
And why our interests, which are which we are trying to.
Nobody has the right to interfere in the affairs of any country.
Colonialists of Apparently lacking.
If people expect to receive justice or coalition free stressed on the implementation of the judiciary should respect of democratic institutions and a dictator or military help to the third world, including Pakistan, and that peace will be established in the coalition is not acceptable.
Pakistan, in the European and American interests.
Pakistan is one of the dominant gained despite the opposition of the population.
And it further emotions against the.
If the US and its allies have the confidence of democracy, the settlement of the respect of the sovereignty of the state, walked out of the region.
In Pakistan so that he himself is or.
Pakistan security forces in Kashmir, is killed in a raid on a camp of the army.
After the Mumbai attacks increased pressure on Pakistan is that the action against extremist organizations.
India's allegation that is involved in the attacks in Mumbai.
US Foreign Minister Condoleezza Rice have told the Pakistani leadership that Mumbai attacks against the trustees and transparent action should be a practical demonstration of.
He says is undoubtedly the extremists to attack on Mumbai on Pakistani soil.
During this time, The officials said in Peshawar is that one of the trucks on the allied forces stationed in Afghanistan and the fire of unknown armed men, which is more than 50 trucks were destroyed.
In Peshawar, This is the second attack on Nato and US supplies during 48 hours.
During this period the sins of the defunct is killed in a raid on a camp of the army and the tribal areas before the armed groups to the many efforts to give compensation to those who back in weapons and the assurance that no action.
situation that General Zia ul Haq in the era of the former Soviet Union interference in Afghan and US Saudi funding of the resistance as a result of the armed groups in Pakistan before 1980 as efforts to take back the environment was not successful.
question is what Pakistan wants to do so?
Pakistan is capable of?
What do you say?
Click here for details
Please note criterion that comments due to an increase in the number of the opinions of the letter will be published in Urdu.
online for the screen on the board Alt shift by pressing Urdu.
My only a question of all humanity is:
If you his children defeat for the sake of it, you take the route, It is impossible
Saeed, Multan
And My question to you that studies with the Islamic studies in the east and the west, any logic, signs and philosophy of the US attack on innocent people including devout, Labor and service trade allowed the murder of poor employees?
And if not, you tip is in dire need of reform.
People have been armed, at this time, It was feared that Russia, Afghanistan, Pakistan after traveling to bust so they were armed.
Now when it is feared that the United States via Pakistan will run on which the current US president openly expressed in his presidential campaign, we have people why an armed.
Only projects so that the United States and India, The Pakistani army to face any kind of public resistance to have not?
Yes, if any of them are involved in a destructive operation, Pakistan only action will be taken against him.
But unfortunately this is the Army of the government of The has declared the right of India that Pakistan is involved in this.
Najib Rehman Sayako, Lahore [P @ KI T @ N
If it is to be accepted that the army is still blaming Pakistan to the government is not right.
A question, and that the terrorists any official or unofficial Indian officials was not get help?
The terrorists in Pakistan, or are ready and prepared in India and other countries of the world are not
As far as the army is concerned, nothing to do with the recent terrorism.
Remember that Hafiz Saeed, was the first jihadi leader who made the Taliban sedition.
, I believe, is that the Taliban uprising US plans to is therefore harassment person to which is necessary to remove any challenge to the Taliban.
The cooperation of the entire nation, despite the Indian battalion in the pressure to take action against the AND THE and losing the spirit.
Saudi to end the campaign with the request that harm the dirt also our society, angrily.
To protest how ethics under the aegis of the United States and Saudi Arabia dangerous weapons in our country and called the jihadi Hate literature and culture of spread of the virus, which the human slaughter in our country.
The danger of attack from India after the Pakistani army has announced that the army from the Afghan border India will give attention to the Taliban and that the announcement of the Afghan border will take us seriously steadfast and its planted stressed that India should not attack on Pakistan.
opened all the reputation of American power in the region.
Although India has not given the threat of attack and its courage.
The Polish US provisions on the attacks of Taliban.
proved that the Pakistan army and Pakistan government without the support of the United States.
Karachi, Pakistan's business is all poor areas of Dubai Financial Center.
Hundreds of thousands of empty hands Never from here, but when the supremacy of law in the western border areas nonexistent. has the attention of Karachi.
Now they are dealing with the kidnapping of the city.
For the first time To said to, who is a stranger to the people in the city is being made, though the need for one.
It is a solution that the Urdu speaking Pashtu or learn the Pashto speaking Urdu, or all learn English, and well.
You definitely will consider it a ridiculous proposal, but because of the conflict does not ridiculous?
The language of violence?
Zaheer Chughtai
Mr. my friends in this proposal, in which every religious and class people were being repeated in childhood, on Yar on these people laughed.
At this time his religious and linguistic the condition of the quick and strong today was not the bus through.
Do not understand it and why?
The catastrophe of the statues are the same?
Innocent and innocent who are being killed in the crime?
reasons Before the pieces to Pakistan to unwanted, the same active and all this chanting, no and not the country.
Mumbai and Karachi home the house caught fire.
Government. the only places in the name of the name change, it is like that now Airport, roads, blood Benazir Bhutto.
Benazir Bhutto, which means the Karachi and the people of Pakistan is?
Of Mumbai attacks on the rise of raw failed to try to start sectarian riots in Karachi in the past have proved that the political elements to work on the payroll of raw now have to resign from the job.
Pashto, speaking of the workers injustice and the Indian threats from Karachi City for a rekindling the core.
All political, religious, sectarian and national parties and full of love for the same reaction, where the Indian diplomatic etiquette are taught us plan lawmakers also provided a chance to think.
The situation in Karachi and BNP impartiality and fast.
administration can control the situation in 1 hour, But life is being given to the cargo
, police and parties due to the pressure of the action.
Alliance points to only statements are limited to political parties should work for their interests and the interests of the common man.
As long as political pressure on the administration of such incidents will continue, in order to Pakistan.
In my opinion, the biggest terrorist are the same people.
And in any foreign powers are suspicious, but I do not know who is that?
But unfortunately this is that if any of the situation on the border in the city, But the fate of the government there when it is not in the border, The government is helpless.
The operation that the government and a big and important city of the country terrorism.
Otherwise, Pakistan will have to face a big financial crisis.
BBC also fear not writing the truth and the condition of the Pakistani media, and soft.
The whole truth is on BBC English.
It is a solution that the Urdu speaking Pashtu or learn the Pashto speaking Urdu, or all learn English, and well.
You definitely will consider it a ridiculous proposal, but because of the conflict does not ridiculous?
The language of violence?
Another story of cruelty in Karachi eventually money which the threat of every citizen was quite a long period.
Of where the bus left no stone on the media this 50 percent of which is here in four days.
The last three nights fortunes and fear is now.
hotel to vacate the Mung bean and killing the people.
Super highway robbers and forests of all the agony of God are out of which they will be arrested.
In your opinion, what are the reasons for the insecurity?
BBC
Ten of India to the Mumbai killed because of chaos in Karachi, secure we the need is not just simple and easy, that is why this disorder insensitivity manifests The 'blood' due.
It's obvious that if it would take any wish-wash with 'father' at the son of, out of the control of will not be.
Blood, Liaqat Ali Khan, and a lot of There was a the wrong to remove it is writing the lion
The tradition, we will also be repeated
John made by John, leading.
Faizan portrayal Siddiqui
It is very sad that the whole country is at stake, and we.
Siddiqui, I say that if the Wikipedia.
Org Liaquat Ali Khan, know that you belong to a respectable Punjabi family of Karnal area of Punjab province.
Because of measures for the migrants from the immigrants today his.
Reaction, It is.
himself, but can be tolerated.
Ejaz Awan
Mr. Before up at the proposal of Jim gathered, tells you that real revel in open you today and tomorrow in the form of wall chalking and posters on walls of Karachi.
We both like the.
Though the villains, the founder of Pakistan and Pakistan not spared, they do not have to face any reaction.
Back in Pakistan to the heart of the meager heart.
A Muslim League was in the eighteenth amendment draft of the People's Party.
Prior to this, the MQM and the Muslim League eighteenth amendment draft of the National Assembly and the Senate in the making.
Yet, it seems that the eighteenth amendment a political ploy, and also approved the amendment in the government is not sincere.
This is the reason that so far the assembly or forced to not fuss lamentation in favor of the amendment on the floor of the Senate and the House that he approved the amendment.
It seems eighteenth amendment draft of these parties to get with Bush. that is, to be able to say that we have collected the amendment was speaker of the government took no action.
MQM, an ally of the government, the Muslim League covert ally of the government and the Muslim League 17th amendment to the party, then how can it be sincere in the parties to end the 17th amendment.
This name in the martyrs is.
The People's Party, The 17th amendment is in no hurry to end.
No better how their hands of thinking.
As long as is not the end of the 17th amendment.
Our a survey in the opinion of the majority and is the truth.
If finished 17th amendment, then never become president.
Now, they are more powerful person with President Pervez Musharraf because he is also the chairman of the People's Party with the president.
As long as he is the 17th amendment.
Political parties to end the 17th amendment to the first President Zardari will have to leave from the chairmanship of the house.
do not want the MQM and other parties.
Our family Most of the old labor class belonged to
And when his uncle in childhood, the maternal uncle and others to stakes in the heart of the same want that God to save the physical Labor.
To prevent this, we wrote a letter to the editor of the daily today and asked that we do after metric that we need to take any physical Labor.
editor wrote in response that Dr. or Inc, go and rests on the subjects.
Our trend from the beginning of and we had completed in instead of technical drawings read.
But at the time of the entry in the Big Brother has forced us to the FSB, The doctor in medical.
We have barely a month read and when some play if it had not changed the subject of the account of.
Fear physical Labor, the INC made many of his family and now we in good position on which we have God thank every time.
It was known at the time when we were trying to take the carpet of the old house with his two young sons.
still do not even half an hour was that younger son spoke deadline is not secure this work in.
We said if it is true, then our way to read and physical Labor belonging to.
Son said read and I am reading will go too, but it is not my work.
Anyhow we all work in three hours and return home.
The meaning of this is that if the destination of the man, the reason behind, it could not stop the floor.
Yes, if you do not know what to do, then you only God is.
says that Murray, bad don't say, but what we have to do on the first anniversary see abuses in them.
Benazir Bhutto has its interests for the sake of freedom to fight the group on the list of India to provide the replacement of the freedom of the movement of the group on the one hand, and on the other hand, the movement of India to suppress the opportunity to focus in Kashmir.
Of Power and Nawaz Sharif defaming the country is a part of history years behind the push.
During the exile Benazir Bhutto negative statements on Kashmir and nuclear program to continue.
Benazir Bhutto Nawaz Sharif with London in violation of the agreement, deal with General Musharraf.
Benazir Bhutto in his power to open the opportunity of the money earner and Mr. tin, due to the same By by their husband
Benazir Bhutto in the era of the brother of the killed and the killer punishment for children.
Benazir Bhutto has avoided fight of women's rights in spite of the woman.
Benazir Bhutto, the dead body of her father in the same way of politics now rando husband politics on his dead body.
Benazir Bhutto got two times the government to punish the culprits of political murder of his father, but could not get the case filed against them.
East Pakistan, 37 years with us and our people and the leaders of the extremist see that this day of grief and mourning on their mistakes.
Should be that we had this year, and such measures on December 16, the day as a warning again that this accident is not.
This day we humanism messages to the people of Bangladesh, and again tried to bring their own.
The ruling to open the file of the Commission and on the reasons for the separation of East Pakistan.
Trapped in Bangladesh, to bring back the Beharis and encourage them to secure their non.
But we have been negligent in our neighborhood died, WE are not Informed Of this.
We do not think of their brothers and sisters, because we have been selfish.
With a big tragedy be passed next day we then lost in their normal life.
If the East and West Germany were to be one of East and West Pakistan can also be a again.
And we can be again if the two sacrifice to secure a second and out of the Shell.
But the desire not to be in the near future.
Today, as news said that the US state kin Waqt governor was arrested in corruption charges.
And remove from the governorship to secure the preparation of scrutiny of the provincial Congress soon to Edit was is one of our American white, the conditions on which there is the pride, that democracy, It says.
In the United States with a man from the law is not past
And your country, Pakistan, which is also the president of corruption charges dropped after scoring.
Our vessel humor and we said if the 156 in a governor who was arrested in Pakistan, our,, arrested The prime minister at a time hanging was covered. and the second base.
Tell me never happened in the United States?
Those who break the law of the country to guard of With departure from the presidential House, tell me what ever in the United States?
Was suspended chief justice in Pakistan that public support Despite he could not be restored yet, what happened in the United States?
Fake degree holder in Pakistan was made, what happened in the United States?
To hear the American poor Hans Hans, partially and with his defeat was also accepted.
President in this picture Zardari around the Americans in spite of the dark smiled.
His smile.
They understand that the United States with the government, but they forget that people are with Pervez Musharraf One year ago.
This picture, Such has been like a family.
Prior to this, the photo of this kind in the newspapers, not the publication of a president with three American officials.
Is the work of the United States in Pakistan has increased and more than one operatives to get to is or is not on the security of the New who was at the first.
It may also be President Zardari's compelling, keeping it was made.
If there is no rational ruling, at least not guiding their teeth in this picture and slavery on the face of it embarrassment to clear.
If democracy should be implemented on the principle of this picture, President Zardari are in the minority.
Democracy, According to the majority of the ruling of the country and who is this is the picture.
Heaven to Swat, Pakistan also said.
Till now, According to the government's strategy of power are being made with dialogues.
Of Power but power and to create sympathy for the people in the Is Not.
It is necessary that the power of the Instead of the government reasons.
Reasons for the end of the grace of God, and will be the end of the Taliban.
ANP on behalf of the government bill at the extent of the Swat will lead to a solution.
But the Islamic law The government economic will also have to pay attention to
General Musharraf since the beginning of this was that this nation corner politicians will get rid of power but changed all his intentions.
WHO also hopes were War of his inclusion in the, In fact began to think
And which was expected to take steps that they.
As soon as the end of the Bush era, they themselves at the end of the power and thieves in the deal.
General Musharraf, the army can control the present government, but do not know that what is happening.
Bajaur Swat or the army does not control and bombing enemy along with the loss of life and property on the people 'enemy' mentally ill to set out the enemy, not
Despite being a military operation for more than two years in the troubled area of the North West Frontier Province Swat things are going from bad to worse.
On the one hand, the writ of the government in this area only condemnatory in the National Assembly passed a resolution to the extent, and on the other hand, Taliban illegal radio channel, THE Influence of the Swat IS MUCH MORE.
Third to ordinary citizens in this thought is that in this area, which is the writ of the practice of Sunnis.
Swat gunship helicopters and tanks during the action of the security forces in the bombing, The death of many extremists claim to know, But despite the number of Taliban not only are most stable, according to one estimate, but his government was set up on Swat percent.
The result is not ready to accept that the failure of the government on the one hand and on the other hand, Taliban stable.
In the WHO, brotherhood city.
Suwat said that no one had asked that the Taliban now in how people are, got a very good because they are security and fighting against the enemies of God and religion.
Then asked that the army is what kind of got that is a very good because they protect the country against the enemies of the country and battering.
, then was asked who are the enemies of religion and the country, we got the city.
I am surprised that the Pakistani Army of the Indian army fought with how will they could not control a small group of Taliban.
Taliban illegally on the track to the Channel, could not that I think is very simple.
But it FM is showering water and poison with injuries.
girls schools. after the boys school are being destroyed.
Curfew is set up so that the Taliban movements easily.
Today eight trucks during the curfew during the night curfew in the outskirts of Mingora, rival.
The question is how that in spite of the curfew.
House army Akbar Bugti, killed in and Taliban.
For this Army of God that Swat The bus from the grip of the Taliban and should prove that the Pakistani army on any enemy can be overwhelming.
Prophet says most of the blood has been shed on the basis of religions in the world, you tell me that if not religion, it would not be evil blood?
Punjabi, Pathan, white and black, and other tribes. the production of all this?
Does not, not, religion, education is that no white no black no Punjabi immigrant not otherwise if religion is not black himself and half of the world community in fighting the war and confront the rest of human beings.
Actually religion only moral training and this is bound to his choice not to come, But the creator of the universe has sent here and here, According to the orders of the living.
As a Muslim, i am sure of Islam is a complete life and the true religion.
residence in London after years of every morning before Televen on every relative of know, though most have never once also no news by phone, then I realized that not even bother to our call. we left the call.
Has two years to live in France. I feel the support.
Diet why not only the prospect of phone calls from US.
about Iraq in a few hours, no problem to send peace forces to Darfur.
Mumbai immediately condemned the attack and suspected organizations as Ban is the work of a few hours.
And where death dance, then is about this, we are advice.
Oh and world peace here, is the end of life.
What really is not waiting for the end of it.
So then any oppressed its right to catapult as could not even think about the use of the weapons of mass destruction?
When a quarter of their loved ones raised is running if you in any part of the heart, a wave of pain not shine?
If not, you human indulge in not only.
But black spot in the name of humanity.
walk it proved that this area is also the country for thousands of years.
Should be that both nations together continue to love and love, but their strings, since it is in the hands of Western and Arab countries, without their desire for here can never to establish peace in the region.
But now, Iran want to fight a proxy war here.
Israeli action at the time to stop, then will be started after the incident.
To the BBC, the interests of the country, The United States and Israel are linked to the hospitality and this is the reason that modernism, under the pretext of the Zionism policies based on newcomer with a series of and unilaterally and unlimited ''.
BBC just '' is doing just upheld the objective of this roundup and mean.
To that votary of this comment should be published so that the idea of the facts in the BBC that very little substance is still remaining.
Thank you.
Was not know how to write this story, but one thing is in every time are drinking the blood of innocent people,
Wars are used in every time and every time in the blood is flowing.
But it's very strange that the 21st century is the man that is very civilized control how day and common is silent on the murder.
How it does not feel that whatever is happening is the worst form of humanity.
regrettable and tragic aspect is that the culture of human beings will present a picture in front of one of the century and human aspect of this.
Khair fools,, Hyderabad Deccan
At this time of Dera Ghazi Khan, along with the winter rains in the whole country.
According to weather a poem is absent, with this poem with rain.
The rains are you
That year, Bihar.
The bride, have declared
Never has come so the cause
has never been conquered it only at night,
Never cry, speak.
The rains are you
In any night
One buried a breeze to
Once it was that put off
Never themselves burned himself.
Never drop in grief are
The rains are you
All these ruling a case and ran away, teeth, or the country.
People sold or lemon peel the ringing of the temples.
Our media leaders like the unlawful.
aims to raise money from the government and not.
Is to talk to the people in the dark about it this ignorance of
Yesterday afternoon, strange matter.
All of the race on the police have been on not to ask the parking.
And and NYPD traffic was not in the mood to that illegal Park terms on vehicles.
was such that a plane of the U.S. air really became the plane and Hudson River in form.
So far only know that terrorists belonged to the generation of birds goose.
Perhaps tomorrow New York's historic cold.
The Not.
themselves to hurt my jaw with half of the hour.
Around the fact that these people who jumped into the river from the plane will be the situation.
Is that all of the people are safe.
And it is that of the company drown in the crisis.
See this opinion in the West Side highway and from New Jersey, and also that South is closed again, what I have?
The return was caught in the same rush.
Thank my one hour during the spelling of course some opened was given that I 56 of the street exit was only.
, if not the first two exit For did not see it on the lines.
Buffet, My Pakistan: congratulations to you, Eid Mubarak.
: Of course,
bloom: congratulations, you, Eid Mubarak.
Sarah: I sacrifice two sacrifices, and as he is Jahanzeb has told
In addition to this, and there is no way.
And on this form the meat have to make, including skin pottery.
: the network in the right time.
Forum on what happened?
lincou
The blog hark for two hands to look.
: congratulations to you, Eid Mubarak.
The head used cranes.
Snow will be disrupted.
We Swati Talibani, free of charge, in a civilized society, which favored on the education of women.
This anger every day not gives women The demolished school and college of expressing their.
, but the way it was not proved to be right, According to the news, the CNN today, Monday, in spite of blessing day Talibani demolished a school of boys from the explosives.
Swat, the Taliban, the boys school collapsed.
Girls' schools, In fact, the famous English saying the lawsuit, The first were demolished, people still don't know the Taliban cultured and culture for animal on why?
One and it is also clear that Talabani at the allegation that they are against the education of girls, is not true.
But they are against the education.
God and power to the Mujahideen, AND Infernal Government
Who is imposed on us, it in the help.
Amen Amen.
One hundred eighty school have been demolished.
Muslims before being born in the tradition of the sound, property in the name of survivors from the Quran to marry tradition, and many regarded the emphasis on the fact that the girl is sane and adult in eight years, not less, The news that the girl with the frog marriage in India.
toe on the occasion of the marriage of the picture.
With this some time ago also brings married the girl with a dog.
See the bridegroom.
humanity in the 21st century is scarce.
Today, is increasing in every sector of life and the intervention of the computer.
computer to a lot of people a lot of this intervention, like that on financial issues.
Where the use of credit cards to you to facilitate it with you on the private life of the law enforcing agencies also is better
That only financial matters such as the record of the use of credit cards, you can be identified.
And when to use the real money in the future will be very little, and will be increased.
This kind of crime in the World Bank credit card instead of taking the risk Of Information ARE Made.
Similarly, now friendship to sources have become
, social network working web sites such as, book and Mai popularity in the first.
But do you not think that mentally we as their social network are manageable, the works are so far from the people.
Similarly match remaking the web site, where other people like you got to the Chemistry is on the list of the people.
Now you can just spent his life as a person?
I can not spend, dedicated for the same to half say better.
In me that the They will meet.
Perhaps I got some parts in the mind.
From childhood to any big who also say the truth for me.
As was sure know the answer every question in the world.
I on this very fun quickly.
But he really does who also possible.
Many complications that Lying was necessary.
In this age of the loss.
So I try to lie at least.
Any false Lara don't and they started with the name of Allah.
And you say then when you pray to God that the job is finished.
The rest of the situation, only God knows better.
It is a hideous issue due to the distance, was born.
According to the law of Pakistan and the two small children should be the mother.
He is responsible for the cost of his father and his father to children.
When the adult children, that want to have that.
You have the right and relatives that the real problem, which turned the bandage taught.
Not dominated on all our deeds.
Here this thinking is that his father's work will create new part in property and is opposed to this process in his father's praiseworthy and forgery.
Our relationship with regard to these spasm establishments have created social abuses.
, and the widow of the concept of marriage is scarce.
This and the beliefs of the traditions are being due to family of the system.
In our society, if a 50 person's wife, a husband or a wife if tensions and be left to take a second marriage, good, why not seen?
Near a Pakistani uncle. his wife, ten or twelve years ago had died, all children now married to a widow after he married a woman, child against them.
In my view, It is the legitimate right of what do you say?
We take our mother's place, we would not tolerate the thinking what kind of thinking?
In my opinion The children should think that if all married children after he married a widowed woman, what was wrong?
He got the support of the widowed woman and uncle was also found no home of plotting
, because their children their have been engaged in the world and will be time do not deteriorate.
The barbarousness.
To their refused to serve the old, then he was?
This is the result of the pressure of the society.
When the people there of the family fun, with children is to be embarrassed by his father's second marriage
Though they should face and said that his father was in accordance with the process of Islam.
In our society, It is a curse for the last 40 -50 victim in the year.
A wife, it approved that the forbidden does but not second marriage to keep it.
If even after his death in a bus.
Mian, along with their as well as a major cause of waste and pollution in the society.
Islam strain of Islam it does not, we like the same, who are our customs and traditions.
, for example, Bani, keep in education to girls, and married on.
You are the big question, Mr. Widow to bring home instead of a widow go home, over top mum and satisfied by experimenting with them Yes, The widow of the again in the stomach strain.
continent we have accepted before Islam centuries in both India and Pakistan but could not to pursue this ignorantly thinking and the tradition of Islam,.
nonsense to men's second marriage, divorce interpretation of defamation, divorced woman untouchable, married to honor the men and women from the age of marriage from the woman's slyness result due to take the same approach.
And, and western nations in the continent and invisible as obsolete.
To Islam, it was easy to think back to depose very difficult.
God we all the courage and Ata representation.
Amen.
Urdu write so difficult, never.
Harmonious home again writes like so much.
matter to.
May Allah protect us.
Rich Timor in his book in Timor I write that his life in it that if any of the army commander in chief will be in the first line, The army never failed.
But on the other hand, the situation and are
Say people die for US, we, martyred
People in my dear,
Assalamu Alaikum,,
After Isha prayers today night in shop on behalf of the a man in a car The his attention.
In the to forget this man has been in vehicle in his entire family was sitting.
The depends in Arabic to good understanding of the unseen in that you said that there is no problem?
The centre in Riyadh depends here in Medina, but my pocket cut you please forgive said that in any help, brother, because 1 with my first that this individual real surveillance that petrol from the full go away, But he started getting to work.
I am very angry has very threatened silent.
Nawab this condition has also for the vehicles of the Muslims family with the in improving the least Hazarika pillager.
While the Hadith Prophet value PBUH, under the Under demanding to.
Allah we What the Made Amen Home Page


renowned singer Adnan Sami on his wife accused of violence, while a police station in Mumbai, reached
, police station, to get in touch with the court.
Adnan wife of Sami Saba her husband against the application of the continuous violence that Adnan Sami.
And human behavior is,
Now it has been out of their tolerance, therefore, Adnan case should be registered against Sami
, police has registered the case and asked to get in touch with the court, saying that this matter is not police the lottery.
In your opinion, Adnan Sami on charges of his wife is correct?
This accusation Adnan Sami Indian attempt to defame not?
Their opinion in this regard.
Adam, Mehr.
As far as the allegations is concerned, no one can get the second.
With Dignity is no thing more
Current wife left the life of my honor and any relation of Adnan Sami Adnan Sami money earner was India, Now the popularity of the psychologist
This is the consequence of his actions.
Washington.
Senior American officials said that President Obama will adopt a tough stand about Afghan President Hamid Karzai
Instead of development in the new strategy of the United States in Afghanistan, has been given more importance.
Officials said that Hamid Zai is being considered as a hurdle in the goals of the US forces in Afghanistan because of corruption in the government, business has increased and the strength of the Taliban is being collected.
American officials said that the US administration in those people who are more on Hamid Karzai put some pressure for a vice president who about Afghanistan and Pakistan President Obama's representative Richard Hall consist of.
This strategy, He said, come after US President George Bush, who is every Hamid after two weeks, with a video conference and stressed on the American role in the reconstruction of Afghanistan and the citizens of this on them.
Officials say that administration will work with the provincial leaders as an alternative to the central government.
Officials say that they, Hamid Zai will focus more on the fight against corruption.
Hamid Karzai is facing new elections this year and it is still not clear that and his companion for the presidency will support them or not.
American officials issued a statement with regard to Afghanistan no indication of a change in American policy?
Is the end of Hamid Karzai?
In this regard, What is your opinion?
Pakistan and Sri between Sri Lanka and Pakistan in the series of three matches a day 1 defeated 3-2.
A crushing defeat to Sri Lanka in one day, but the next two Sri Lanka has won the election.
A day in the third match in the performance of the national cricket team is very poor, the national team of Sri Lanka 309 runs only 23 overs in reply of 75 runs on and thus he had to face defeat of caution.
The result of the series this proves that there is no continuity in the performance of the national team.
Home ground, and despite Of all the claims, the national team defeated, in your opinion, what are the reasons for this?
Authorities the need to give more attention to the fields of?
Are you satisfied with the selection of the team?
You will be the responsibility of the sector, fielding and batting or bowling?
Their opinion.
Country Babar, Jeddah, It is very sad that the era of Also ignorantly cultures goes on this land, farmers, the landlord savagely sovereignty from targeting the innocent people who are will say?
Any Sardar you on the trench, the government does not take action against them?
Judicial justice When work came
Sri Lankan cricket team to play one day international series has arrived in Pakistan
The tension between India and Pakistan, despite the arrival of the foreign team is welcome.
The Sri Lankan team was warmly welcomed at Karachi airport.
Two one match between Sri Lanka and Pakistan, while the third will be one day in Lahore, Karachi
Both teams from the bowling, batting and fielding a tall claims are being made.
To Sri Lanka is on his spinners to Pakistan faith on the fast bowling.
Sri Lanka captain Chandana has said that one of the Pakistan team player, the whole team is dangerous.
Muralitharan and Mendes Trump agreed unconditionally card will be while Pakistan captain said that the competition will be very strict.
Shoaib Malik said that played on Muralitharan, will also see, we have prepared a secret game plan, rendering it, will be in the field.
Really, Sri Lanka, According to the claims will be interesting and sensational?
The series between Sri Lanka and Pakistan in what will be the border?
Who will win the series?
Who will be the Man of the Series?
Their opinion.
Rosy, London, The statement you even to give priority to our desire is that you should tell the truth, not back in the state of Mukherjee crane as brutal Lord right ahead of the order and the jihad is Mukherjee said of the statement and try to stay in the news.
Country Yusuf, Dubai.
All of these people are fighting a war of independence for the last 60 years.
Nobody asked not now have caught the same man of extremism and terrorism, patch started the talks.
Before the murder of Muslims in seeking to resolve the issues.
However, Pakistan will have to understand their dual policy,
Asad Khan, London
India this kind of situation is that the attention of the world away from Kashmir be
But Pakistan has the face of the reality of the world.
Now, The British Government is also considering this Indian Kashmir to Pakistan in the name of terrorism from the eyes are stealing
While on this issue with Pakistan and are investing
British Foreign Minister David got the band has said that extremism will be removed from the resolution of the Kashmir issue, The government will deal with the dangers on the border with Pakistan.
It should be noted that prior to this, the newly elected US President Obama also expressed similar views on the Kashmir issue.
British Foreign Minister talking to the media in Mumbai and wrote in the article that the war against terrorism is wrong, the risks facing the reason President Bush's policy was to kill people.
David the band has said that Pakistan will not show any leniency for extremist groups.
Major powers on the need for the resolution of Kashmir dispute with India because of tension in the region trying to divert attention from the problem, not?
In Mumbai terrorism is not part of this strategy?
India wants to escape from the process of composite dialogue on the basis of terrorism?
about his opinion.
Usman Aftab.
In my opinion, the big powers are complete loss to Pakistan is not in the mood
But some steps to control the thinking of them know that Pakistan is a nuclear power.
Here want to create a situation of the revolution
Foreign countries are thinking the same corner to Pakistan that political, geographical, there may be some difficulties to help Pakistan and you want to meet its goals.
A citizen, and the U.S..
Always of the Hindu tradition that the side in the face of a knife Ram
I think that the bus through a little pain in the stomach and he comes to threaten Pakistan are
We are ready to India, Chief of the Army keep his mouth, otherwise we know its answer.
Fahim Siddiqui.
Poll, of the US vice statement in the mind of the United States, is as bad, but India is of the same attack and who will come to know the truth, how much water in
Hamas attack on Israel, but no shame in that the rioters, India also saw Israel's India wants to do the same.
Prime Minister Syed Yousaf Raza Gilani said that American newly elected vice president Former President Musharraf's uniform and played an important role in restoring democracy, it is for the government of Pakistan has blessed by the star.
uniform and the restoration of democracy in a political party should not be credit, parliament, rubber stamp is not
All decisions will be taken in parliament.
The prime minister was saying that chapter of Dr. Qadeer Khan has been closed.
You think the exerted was no importance of public protest against?
The lawyers of the movement did not play any role?
The prime minister's statement on what you want to say.
Their opinion.
US President George W. Bush, The newly elected president in a farewell press conference Barak Obama to advise, said that he has many mistakes in his office and Barak Obama who started right,
As the president According to the situation and the American steps under the law and the constitution, American interests priority on his popularity
, He said the enemy of the United States are planning to attack on America, Barak Obama will be the biggest challenge to stop these attacks,
He said that the absence of weapons of mass destruction from Iraq, is the biggest disappointment for me to complete the mission in Iraq, and I was the biggest mistake.
Addressing his last press conference in the White House, The American president said that this is my last press conference and to participate in the conference, journalists and other friends I thank participate in it.
Do you think that mistakes will not be repeated the Bush?
Did not delay in to admit the mistakes?
Will follow on the advice of Bush?
Their opinion.
US Vice President Dick Cheney said that Osama Bin Laden dead or alive, I want to see.
He said that Osama Bin Laden is in a difficult area and for his organization has been ineffective, if Osama Bin Laden dead or alive also arrested, then this will be to the end of this organization.
America is determined to arrest Osama Bin Ladin and the search continued for the mortgage.
Osama to arrest the desire of Dick Cheney will be?
about his opinion.
Shahid Afridi, as all rounder cricketer PIA in Azam trophy clash with one of the spectators and Habib Bank after the end of the first day of the match.
UBL Shahid Afridi on the ground after the match play as soon as drawings came out of the room, a large number of fans gathered around them.
At one point, one of the spectators with their Shahid Afridi on the application of the goals, said yesterday the picture, However, Shahid Afridi on the insistence of the spectators tech slaps in the papers before they are there people issue appeasement times.
After which the Shahid Afridi said that the issue is being made at this time, I was quickly, the prayer
However, I will apologize to spectators,
Shahid Afridi on this attitude, you will say.
Their opinion.
Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh has once again alleged that Pakistan is the atmosphere of war
Pakistan and terrorism is used as a state policy.
While addressing the chief ministers conference in New Delhi, Manmohan Singh said that the terrorists backing from the neighboring countries especially Pakistan.
The terrorists and the Mumbai attacks from the path and Indian coast guard were safe.
The Indian prime minister said that the Mumbai attack in November.
He further said that the terrorists are using new techniques and modern communication system, we will also increase pressure on the Line of Control where infiltration, He said that he will not tolerate any form of terrorism, and this is our policy.
Indian Prime Minister's allegation how you see?
's internal struggles, a reflection of the Indian anxiety?
What At the whims of the threatening attitude adopted?
Their opinion.
Zubair Khan, Karachi.
This is a very bitter tragedy that the Israeli killing of Palestinians are on the other hand, the Kashmir is the same situation, but not as the head of the Islamic Council.
As organizations who are present in Palestine and Kashmir should the war will continue until its independence and create competition of any kind of aggression, not one day of his martyrdom will bring
Continuing the Israeli air attack on Gaza, hundreds of Palestinian men, women and children have been killed so far.
Hamas political was martyred along with his wife and children.
On the other hand, the Security Council's meeting ended without any decision.
Meeting in Libya and other Arab countries against Israel submitted by the condemnatory American opposition to the resolution.
The Palestinian civilian population Many continued the bombardment of Israeli planes.
Mumbai was the roar of the entire world, But the Israeli attacks on the United States, Britain, including the murder of not?
Important countries of the Muslim community are silent?
The world's double standards on what you want to say.
Saeed, New York.
In my opinion, the real thing is that our most of the nation is read and do not know where their money is going to fulfill his responsibilities by government tax is interested in the crisis of electricity and gas.
Because the people who have elected them are all aware of,
And breadth of Pakistan in the electricity and gas crisis can be developed.
On the other hand, the average increase in the prices of gas from the 1st of January, has been in some of the cities in the country is a cause of concern for the people of petrol.
Long closure of electricity and gas in industrial and business circles of Pakistan on the crisis of severe reaction, expanding and violent demonstrations continue,
Industrialists to shut down the factories of the ultimatum.
In Karachi, On the other hand, eight to 10 hours of load shedding in the citizens.
Industrial life was almost paralyzed.
Government institutions in this regard accusations at each other in their statement.
electricity and gas prices with the increase of the nation is not fun?
attention towards the solution of problems is not being given?
Government for the development of transportation does not see?
Will you suggested the steps immediately to overcome this crisis?
Their opinion.
Imran Khokar Madina, I want to say that people like the same ruling.
surprised me is that public a slogan of the government of the people is the B
Mixed petrol gas is not a punishment of
The agencies of the government there is no control.
The law and order situation in the day to day demolition is God to forgive His mercy for this country
The New Year.
From last year political depression and was a year of biography, will also be remembered with regard to terrorism.
Eight years of separation from the power of President Musharraf and President Bush, Bush on the rain and the establishment of a democratic government in Pakistan, in the wake of natural disasters, In all over the world, the financial crisis, vulgarity.
Now the arrival of the new year, you know how to see the coming year?
Near the political or geographical situation will bring of what would be the strategy?
Any hope of progress in the eradication of terrorism?
judicial crisis in Pakistan will come to an end?
Relations between Pakistan and India will adopt the direction?
The surgical or has the possibility of war?
New Year with what do you expect?
Their opinion.
Benazir Bhutto is being celebrated the first anniversary of the killing, 27 December 2007 Liaquat Bagh, in an election meeting after the martyr has gone.
Benazir Bhutto today, we are not in a serious, politics, and based on the world famous personality, his unique role in national politics.
Despite the passing of a year were not able to solve the puzzle of his martyrdom.
Hard work in the establishment of democracy in Pakistan and the government were not void.
Today is to establish a democratic government in Pakistan and her husband, Asif Zardari on the post of the president of the country.
Benazir Bhutto in Pakistan's politics, the role of how you see?
Who is behind the martyrdom of?
Recently, with the international human rights award, he was about political and democratic services exerted what you want to say.
President Bush 8 years on the white government in America and the presidential office were shifted to Camp David, so that the new president to White House Barak Obama according to the wishes of the renovated and decoration and be ready,
Eight years of the Bush presidency in the attack on the historic attack on the World Trade Center and the destruction, point in America and the world war against terrorism in Afghanistan and Iraq in the military action, while the forces of different countries in this war, Bush became memorable examples of roles and full use of resources in this war.
From this war to America, the worst in the history of the economic and financial crisis.
Do you think the world in this war and rower found?
The policies of President Bush succeed?
During the era of President Bush, What is your opinion?
The Indian Government has visited the Indian cricket team to Pakistan.
The Indian cricket team to tour in three Tests in Pakistan, five a day and 20 matches to play.
Vice president of the Indian cricket board Shukla said while talking to GEO News that the board had asked for permission from the government to the Pakistan tour, But this visit is not possible due to the tense situation between the two countries.
The current political situation of the Indian government to the cricket team to tour is the right step, the game should not separate from politics?
The Indian Government's decision for not harmful?
the bad security situation in India cricket team continue to visit, the Indian team visited Pakistan Why can not?
Your opinion in this regard.
Salman, Karachi.
People who are proud to India
And his films or video on the are now be opened his eyes that how you do the dignity of the people of India.
Of Adnan Sami I remember an interview in which he said that the Pakistani British citizenship is not my
Adnan Sami to Pakistan in the first rest tomorrow because thee to there was not,
Ahmad.
Karachi.
After the attack of the attitude has been changed
Jagjit Singh, the reaction in this case that he hated to Pakistan and Pakistani
know that Adnan Sami songs with cow are now he was from the top, Adnan Sami in India should be coming here is not needed
Mohammad Shamshad,
Karachi, Jagjit Singh's statement on would only say that he is the minds of cameleon
Who is the statement to Pakistanis eyes that your money in India is understand the mentality of.
Mumbai after the incident of the hatred of the statement is now the famous poison against Sami are showering.
According to an international news agency in Iraq farewell visit to US President Bush during a press conference at his office in Baghdad, along with the prime minister Noor al-maleki at this time, The situation was ridiculous when an Iraqi journalist, explained to President Bush, said this is a farewell kiss dogs.
After a journalist shoe picked by Bush, threw his head before President Bush the shoe with expertise, and leaned on your guarded.
Second shoe American flag.
Security personnel to this journalist, from the place.
On this occasion, President Bush said that I do not know why did they do it, shoe was No. 10, I did not face any problem.
In your opinion, this process of the Iraqi people had not expressed their anger against President Bush?
On this incident, What do you say?
The tension in relations between India and Pakistan after the incidents of terrorism in Mumbai at this time, the grave situation increased ahead of the Indian Air Force fighter planes in Lahore and violation of Pakistan's air limits in the sectors.
Pakistan air forces of Indian plane were forced to go back.
According to the sources, The two Indian plane were armed with weapons and ammunition.
This is the first incident of its kind in the present tense situation.
Pakistan Air Force said that the air force is fully prepared to defend the country.
Information MInister Shiri Rehman SAID THAT The Indian authorities has acknowledged that the violation of air Limits, However, It was a mistake.
Pakistan's military sources described the incident as serious.
In your opinion, what really has the intention of air attacks on India?
This stand is that it was a mistake or violation of India, the purpose of the potential of the Pakistan Air Force?
This incident will not cause of the increase of tension between the two countries?
Their opinion.
martyred Benazir after death of the international human rights award was given by his son, Chairman of the People's Party and Bhutto and Zardari to receive.
The President of the United Nations office in a ceremony during the meeting of the General Assembly, former prime minister of Pakistan in Benazir Bhutto with this award in recognition of his services for their human rights.
Of the human rights resolution from the United Nations 60th birthday was celebrated on December 10.
On this occasion for the human rights of personalities and institutions to work in these awards are being Benazir Bhutto, former Attorney General Luis Ramzi Clark of the United States and all over the world to work for human rights in the international organization Human Rights Watch.
This occasion proxim Pakistan's U.N. Ambassador Abdullah Haroon and other Pakistani senior diplomatic officials were also present.
Former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto on receiving this award, you say.
Sameer.
Chicago.
It is true that He but we also remember that he has shed the blood of innocent people in Karachi, on which he was proud that this Naseer Allah Baber has done a very good job,
After lakin in just were
But it is also true that he has his party's senior people, A representative of the People's Party and his son chosen, This is what kind of democracy?
Jimmy Noor, Karachi, this news from the Quran has proved that the dissident OF THE WILL.
But as long as the iron ax group doesn't axe can not cut on
Our government is that they are secret ways in the country due to the same unpleasantly are coming.
To our rulers.
Hafiz Mohammed Saeed, The panel of the United Nations Security Council, including three Pakistani citizens and five organizations, including the name of included in the list of terrorists.
Security Council of Al Qaeda and Taliban committee has approved to be included in the list of terrorists in the name of the Pakistanis in the Dawa party Mohammad Saeed, a banned organization, the operations chief Zaki Rehman, head of the finance department, Haji Mohammad Ashraf.
In addition to this, a Saudi citizen name is also included in the list of terrorists.
These organizations in the Dawa party, Pasban Kashmir, al-Rashid Trust trust.
Legend personalities and organizations of all member countries will freeze the assets and ban the travel and they will be arrested.
Their cases.
It sanctions under the Influence OF the Indian Propaganda, NOT?
India without any evidence of the Mumbai attacks on these organizations, Why is it?
Not terrorist organizations in India?
, did not know the International Organization to the minorities in India?
Their opinion.
Eid and the spokesman of unity Azha process on the Abraham to sacrifice of animals.
At this critical time When Inflation IS ON THE rise In the Actual Political Situation, I POOR AND all their Power, According to the Preparation of The Eid AND Eid Congratulations To his friends in Different WAYS.
We are providing an opportunity through the blog that their loved ones in the form of short messages to congratulate the Eid.
You can also congratulated by the poetry of Eid.
Jilani,
Karachi, our rulers should understand that the operation against the same judge of Pakistan, which are all kinds of oppression suffered, but love with Pakistan
If a war they will fight the Pakistan
When he will be the feeling of love, protest will not get anything from politics, I think there is the possibility of a decisive war between the two out.
